Language: <F P=105> Hungarian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Law No. 110 of 1993 on National Defense adopted by the </F>
National Assembly on 7 December 1993] 
  [Text] 
<H6>  Law No. 110 of 1993on National Defense </H6>
  Determined to abstain from using force against, or from 
threatening with the use of force the independence and 
territorial integrity of other states; 
  Endeavoring to reach peaceful settlements in international 
disputes, and rejecting war as a means for dispute resolution; 
  Recognizing the requirements for societal peace and for the 
constitutional functioning of an independent, democratic 
constitutional state; and further, 
  Consistent with obligations established by the UN Charter 
and 
other international agreements, 
  The National Assembly creates the following law concerning 
the national defense of the Hungarian Republic 
  in the interest of preserving the independence and 
territorial integrity of the Hungarian Republic, as well as of 
protecting its borders as fixed by international agreements, and 
its populace and material assets, 
  based on an equal status with neighboring and other 
countries, and on mutual respect for each other's interests. 
<H6>  Chapter I </H6>
  THE FOUNDATIONS OF NATIONAL DEFENSE 
  1.1. Defending the country is a national cause. In 
maintaining national defense capabilities, the Hungarian 
Republic shall rely primarily on its own strength: on the 
resources of its national economy, the preparedness and 
determination of its armed forces, and on the patriotic 
commitment of the citizenry to defend its homeland, and its 
willingness to sacrifice. 
  1.2. The armed forces shall have prime 
responsibility for realizing the goals of national defense. The 
armed forces shall be under continuous civilian supervision in 
times of both peace and war. 
  1.3. The armed forces shall operate in the 
framework of a peculiar system of organization and subordination. 
  1.4. In general, the members of the armed forces 
shall be entitled to all human and civil rights enjoyed by other 
citizens. These rights may be limited only to an absolute 
minimum extent demanded by the peculiar features of military 
service, and only when that such limitations are unavoidable, 
and become necessary as a result of constraint. 
  1.5. In preparing for national defense and for the 
performance of national defense tasks, state organs shall 
support the armed forces by providing direction and organizing 
work; business organizations and the populace shall provide 
support by performing services. Citizens shall participate in 
this effort by providing personal services. 
  1.6. National defense tasks shall be implemented 
at the lowest possible cost. Performing national defense 
obligations in times of peace shall not present a 
disproportionate burden or disadvantage to the affected persons. 
  2. It shall be the goal of national defense to 
defend the independence of the Hungarian Republic, the 
inviolability of its territory, as well as the populace and 
tangible assets by using military force if attacked by an alien 
power, and to coordinate the preparation of the state 
organization, and within that, the armed forces and organs 
responsible for maintaining public order, and further, the 
national economy, the social organizations, and the citizens 
affected. 
  3.1. In the interest of realizing the goals of 
national defense, and consistent with constitutional provisions, 
this law defines 
  a. the organizational system, tasks and jurisdictions of 
the state's direction of national defense; 
  b. the tasks of, and rules applicable to the armed forces; 
  c. basic rules regarding the tasks and jurisdiction of 
state and other organs participating in the performance of 
national defense tasks; 
  d. detailed rules for the performance of national defense 
obligations of a personal or material character; and 
  e. provisions to protect the social welfare interests of 
those performing national defense obligations. 
  3.2. Until such time that separate laws required 
by Paragraphs 19.B.-D. of the Constitution are enacted, this law 
contains basic, temporary rules to be applied in extraordinary 
and emergency conditions proclaimed consistent with the 
Constitution, and with respect to the National Defense Council. 
  3.3. The separate laws referred to in Paragraph 
3.2 above, shall be enacted prior to 31 December 1997. 
<H6>  Chapter II </H6>
  DIRECTING NATIONAL DEFENSE 
  The central direction of national defense 
  4.1. According to the Constitution, this Law, and 
provisions of other law, in times of peace the National 
Assembly, the president of the Republic, the Government, the 
minister of defense, and ministers having jurisdiction based on 
their functions and scope of authority are authorized to direct 
national defense, and within that, the armed forces. 
  4.2. Pursuant to Paragraph 3.2., Paragraphs 
249.-256. of this Law contain temporary provisions regarding the 
National Defense Council's scope of authority. 
  The National Assembly 
  5.1.The National Assembly determines 
  a. the basic principles that define the national defense of 
the Hungarian Republic, and the chief directions and conditions 
for implementing the prescribed tasks in order to realize the 
goals of national defense; 
  b. the direction to be taken in the long range development 
of the armed forces; and 
  c. the detailed breakdown of the personnel size of the 
armed forces, and the important means for military technology 
development. The National Assembly also provides for the needed 
financial resources as part of the annual budget law. 
  5.2. If a state of war or the imminent threat of 
an attack by a foreign power exists, the National Assembly 
decides the ordering of general mobilization in the country, and 
of escalating the combat readiness of the armed forces as a 
whole, in conjunction with mobilization. 
  The National Defense Committeeof the National 
Assembly 
  6.1. The National Defense Committee of the 
National Assembly shall continually monitor the implementation 
of tasks by the armed forces, the preparedness and equipment 
standards, and the utilization of materiel placed at the 
disposal of the armed forces. 
  6.2. Each year, the Government shall present the 
drafts of proposed extraordinary measures (Paragraph 201.) to 
the National Defense Committee. The National Defense Committee 
may recommend to the National Assembly that it assign to the 
Government the task of developing extraordinary measures. 
  6.3. The minister having jurisdiction shall 
present proposed measures (legal provisions, individual 
decisions) affecting the organization of the armed forces to the 
National Defense Committee for review, provided that such 
measures involve 
  a. 1,000 or more persons, or 
  b. the termination of an activity, or the initiation of a 
new activity. 
  6.4. Prior to the appointment of persons nominated 
for the posts of the commander and the chief of staff of the 
Honved [National Defense] Forces, and of the national commander 
of the Border Guard, the National Defense Committee shall hold a 
nomination hearing and shall state its views regarding the 
fitness of the persons examined to serve in these positions. 
  The president of the Republic 
  7.1. The president of the Republic shall 
  a. approve the country's armed defense plan (hereinafter: 
defense plan) submitted by the prime minister; 
  b. appoint and relieve of their duties the commander of the 
Hungarian Honved Forces (hereinafter: Honved Forces) and its 
chief of staff upon recommendation by the minister of defense, 
and the national commander of the Border Guard upon 
recommendation by the minister of the interior; and shall 
  c. grant company flags to the military organizations of the 
armed forces, upon recommendation by the minister having 
jurisdiction. 
  7.2. (Consistent with the provisions of Paragraph 
30/A.1.i. of the Constitution), upon recommendation by the 
minister of defense, alternatively by the minister of the 
interior, the president of the Republic shall 
  a. dismiss from service, or retire generals; 
  b. return generals to active duty; 
  c. dismiss generals as a matter of punishment, and further, 
reduce to a lower rank, or reduce the grade of generals, except 
if the same is required based on the judgment of a court. 
  7.3. The president of the Republic shall receive 
informational copies of proposed legal provisions affecting 
national defense and the armed forces, as well as of draft 
proposals for organizational changes described in Paragraph 6.3. 
  7.4. The president of the Republic may request 
information from the Government regarding any matter affecting 
the functioning of the armed forces. 
  The Government 
  8.1. To ensure the country's defense preparedness, 
the Government shall 
  a. present to the National Assembly the basic principles 
applicable to the national defense of the Hungarian Republic; 
  b. render decisions regarding the mobilization of the 
economy; determine the state of the country's defense reserves 
and military industry capacity, and establish state functions 
relative to the preparation and development of transportation 
and communications for national defense purposes; 
  c. define tasks related to preparations for civil defense; 
  d. make decisions concerning the partial mobilization of 
the country, and the placement of the armed forces on a higher 
level of combat readiness in conjunction with partial 
mobilization, and the placement of the armed forces on a higher 
level of combat readiness in the absence of mobilization; 
  e. determine the national defense tasks of organs involved 
in national defense; 
  f. streamline the national defense preparation and national 
mobilization activities of the various ministries and organs 
with national jurisdiction (hereinafter: ministry); and 
  g. provide for the functioning of the National Defense 
Council. 
  8.2. The head of government, or the minister 
designated by the head of government, shall report annually on 
behalf of the Government to the National Assembly concerning the 
implementation of national defense policies, and the 
preparation, condition and development of the Hungarian armed 
forces. 
  8.3. Regarding the direction of the functioning of 
the armed forces the Government shall establish 
  a. the order of the upper level leadership of the armed 
forces; 
  b. fundamental requirements regarding the geographical 
location, equipment and preparation of the Honved forces; 
  c. tasks related to preparing the country's territory for 
combat operations; and further, 
  d. the Government shall take all necessary action to repel 
unexpected attacks as provided for in Paragraph 19/E of the 
Constitution, in order to protect the constitutional order, the 
lives and property of citizens, public order, and public 
security. 
  8.4. As part of the annual budget, the Government 
shall 
  a. project the costs of maintaining and developing the 
armed forces; 
  b. separate from the projections required in Subsection a. 
above, project the expenditures to be incurred as a result of 
national defense preparations and the mobilization of the 
economy, and within that, the costs to be incurred as a result 
of establishing operating conditions for the National Defense 
Council and for a civilian air attack warning system, and 
implement the approved reallocation of budgeted funds. 
  8.5. The Government may promulgate decrees or 
determinations to implement the provisions of Paragraphs 8.1 and 
8.3. 
  8.6. When proceeding under the authority of 
Paragraphs 8.1 and 8.3, the Government shall provide appropriate 
protection for the built-up and natural environment. 
  The minister of defenseand the minister of the 
interior 
  9.1. The minister of defense shall be the 
Government's competent minister responsible for implementing the 
country's national defense tasks. Consistent with this status, 
the minister of defense shall exercise all authority to direct 
national defense efforts not delegated to other organs or 
persons by the Constitution, this Law, or separate law. 
  9.2. The minister of the interior shall direct the 
Border Guard. A separate law governs the authority of the 
minister of the interior to direct the Border Guard. 
  10. Within the scope of providing professional 
direction for national defense activities, the minister of 
defense shall 
  a. draft basic principles for the national defense of the 
Hungarian Republic, and countersign the defense plan; 
  b. submit plans to the Government for the development, 
equipment, preparation, and geographical deployment of the 
Honved Forces, and for preparing the territory of the country 
for military operations; 
  c. prepare decisions for the Government regarding 
preparations for the armed defense of the populace, tangible 
assets, and the state administration against an external attack, 
and for the mobilization of the armed forces; 
  d. streamline the preparation of organs participating in 
national defense to prepare for, and to perform national defense 
and national mobilization tasks; 
  e. cooperate with ministers having jurisdiction regarding 
  -- the manufacture of military technology equipment and 
military equipment materials, and the securing of military 
industry capacities, 
  -- the determination of conditions for the use of air 
space for air transportation and other purposes, and the 
establishment of rules of cooperation between civilian air 
transport services and military organizations having 
jurisdiction, 
  -- the determination of the location of objects important 
from the standpoint of military and civil defense, and ensuring 
the functioning of the health care, transportation, and 
communication networks, as well as of the aerial, chemical, and 
radiation signaling and alarm systems, to the extent that this 
can be expected in due regard to the developmental stage of 
these systems; 
  f. maintain international relations. As part of this 
function, the minister of defense shall appoint and assign 
military attaches, and shall maintain relations with military 
attaches accredited to the Hungarian Republic; 
  g. determine the professional national defense 
administrative tasks of state administrative organs subordinate 
to the central government, and of local defense administrative 
organs, and supervise their activities; 
  h. head the Ministry of Defense and direct the activities 
and functioning of other organs assigned under his jurisdiction; 
  i. promulgate decrees for the implementation of national 
defense tasks; 
  j. act as an authority within the scope specified in a 
government decree promulgated on the basis of law or National 
Assembly authorization; 
  k. determine on the basis of law the order of protecting 
state and official secrets of a military character. 
  11.1. As part of directing the Honved Forces, the 
minister of defense shall 
  a. determine leadership levels and the chain of command in 
the Honved Forces pursuant to Government decisions; 
  b. establish preparedness requirements, and criteria for 
combat readiness, for bringing up the army to full strength, and 
for mobilization; 
  c. based on the Government's decision, instruct the 
commander of the Honved Forces to place the Honved Forces in a 
state of higher level combat readiness and to mobilize; 
  d. establish the order of protecting the territory of the 
country by anti-aircraft and ready alert air forces based on the 
defense plan; 
  e. prepare a detailed budget and rules for the internal 
management of funds within limitations established by government 
decree; control the proper utilization of appropriated funds for 
designated purposes; establish management requirements and the 
order of financial audits; establish or terminate organs 
authorized by the budget pursuant to law; 
  f. direct the procurement of military technology equipment 
and materiel, and the provision of these to military 
organizations; 
  g. direct and supervise the activities of the Military 
Security Office and the Military Intelligence Office within the 
framework established in the law on national security 
activities; 
  h. exercise his legal authority with respect to military 
educational institutions; 
  i. consistent with Government personnel policies, establish 
principles of personnel management and assign the various 
authorities related to personnel administration; exercise 
authority over personnel matters as defined by law; 
  j. establish requirements for satisfying needs (material, 
technical, financial, health care, and so forth) indispensable 
from the standpoint of maintaining and operating the Honved 
Forces; 
  k. establish guidelines for research in the field of 
military science; 
  l. prescribe the activities of organs under his direction 
using other legal means for directing the state (directives, 
guidelines, legal guidance); direct legal and administrative 
activities, and the military law advisory activities of the 
Honved Forces; and 
  m. assist interest groups in performing their functions. 
  11.2. Acting within his scope of authority based 
on law or government decree, the minister of defense shall issue 
an individual order only to the commander of the Honved Forces, 
and shall require only the commander of the Honved Forces to 
report to him. 
  11.3. Honved organs (or heads of organs) empowered 
by law to act as authorities shall not be given instructions as 
to the contents of determinations to be issued based on such law. 
  11.4. Rules pertaining to the legal consequences 
related to commands shall apply to individual orders specified 
in Paragraph 11.2. 
  12.1. The minister of defense shall enforce 
legality in the operations of the Honved Forces, and shall 
discontinue violations of law. Within this scope of 
responsibility, the minister shall 
  a. regularly verify compliance with legal provisions; 
  b. upon noticing violations of law, direct the person 
violating the law to pursue his activities consistent with law; 
  c. annul or change actions that violate laws; and 
  d. annul or change decisions made in individual cases in 
violation of laws. 
  12.2. If the illegal action was taken by the 
commander of the Honved Forces or by a superior belonging to the 
command, annulment or change pursuant to Paragraph 12.1.c. above 
shall take effect on the date it is published in the official 
journal of the Ministry of Defense; with respect to the illegal 
action of other personnel, annulment or change shall take effect 
on the date of delivery to the initiator of the illegal action. 
Different effective dates for annulment or change may be 
established for important reasons, unless this creates arbitrary 
conditions. 
  12.3. A decision pursuant to Paragraph 12.1.d. 
shall not be annulled or changed, if 
  a. the decision was reviewed by a court; 
  b. the annulment or changing of the decision violates a 
right acquired and exercised in good faith; 
  c. a year has passed since the decision was made or since 
the decision has taken effect; or if 
  d. the decision is ruled out or conditioned by law. 
  12.4. A decision pursuant to Paragraph 12.3.b. 
shall be annulled or changed irrespective of a right acquired 
and exercised in good faith, if 
  a. the case that gave rise to the decision was not under 
the decision-maker's authority; 
  b. the decision-maker or a person involved in the 
decision-making breached his duty in violation of the Criminal 
Code of Laws and if this fact influenced the decision, provided 
that the commission of a crime was determined in an affirmed 
judgment of a court, or if a judgment to this effect was ruled 
out by the lack of proof. 
  12.5. A decision may be annulled pursuant to 
Paragraph 12.4. within three years from the date of the 
decision, or from the date when the decision gained legal effect. 
  Ministers and heads of organs with national 
jurisdiction 
  13.1. Ministers or heads of organs with national 
jurisdiction (hereinafter: ministers) shall direct pursuant to 
law the national defense related activities of the specialized 
branches, or the functions to be performed under extraordinary 
or emergency conditions by subordinate organs, or organs under 
their supervision. 
  13.2. To ensure compliance with the provisions of 
Paragraph 13.1., ministers shall 
  a. establish professional criteria for the implementation 
of national defense tasks under their respective jurisdictions, 
as well as orders requiring cooperation between organs under 
their direction and local defense administrative organs; 
  b. ensure the performance of tasks defined in Paragraph 
10.e., in cooperation with the minister of defense; 
  c. prepare separate budgets within the respective budgets 
under their jurisdictions to cover costs to be incurred in 
performing national defense tasks. 
  13.3. The detailed national defense tasks and 
jurisdictions of ministers shall be detailed in the form of a 
government decree. 
  National defense administration at the local 
level 
  14. As defined by this and other law, as well as 
by government decree, national defense shall be administered 
locally under the authority of local defense administrative 
organs, as well as of county (or Budapest) selective service 
commands. 
  Budapest and county defense committees 
  15.1. Budapest and county defense committees 
(hereinafter jointly: defense committees) shall be state 
administrative organs functioning as organs subordinate to the 
central government; within their respective areas of 
jurisdiction they shall perform tasks related to national 
defense preparedness and national mobilization as provided for 
by law or government decree relative to the various defense 
committees. 
  15.2. The Government shall direct the performance 
of national defense tasks by defense committees directly, or 
through ministers having jurisdiction. 
  15.3. Under extraordinary or emergency conditions, 
and in the course of implementing governmental measures pursuant 
to Paragraph 19/E.1. of the Constitution, all authority vested 
in the defense committees shall be exercised by the regional 
prefect of the Republic having jurisdiction. 
  15.4. The regional prefect of the Republic having 
jurisdiction in the area in which a defense committee has 
jurisdiction, shall be the chairman of the defense committee. 
  The membership of any defense committee shall be composed 
of: 
  a. the head of the office of the regional prefect of the 
Republic, or of the regional office; 
  b. the chairmen of the counties' general assemblies within 
the region; 
  c. the mayors of cities empowered to exercise the authority 
of counties; 
  d. in Budapest the lord mayor; 
  e. the county (Budapest) commander of the selective service 
command; 
  f. the heads of law and order organs designated by the 
Government, and of centrally directed county (Budapest) organs, 
as well as the secretary of the defense committee. 
  15.5. The chairmen of given local defense 
committees shall also participate in decision-making if the 
decisions affect the tasks of local defense committees. 
  15.6. Defense committees shall be regional organs. 
Defense committees shall establish their own organizational and 
operating rules. 
  15.7. The costs of operating defense committees 
shall be budgeted by the office of the regional prefect of the 
Republic. 
  16.1. Under their national defense administrative 
authority, defense committees shall 
  a. direct the local defense committees (Paragraph 17.1.); 
  b. direct the national defense functions of the lord mayor 
and the mayors (hereinafter jointly: mayors), and perform civil 
defense functions delegated under their jurisdiction; 
  c. establish criteria and tasks related to national defense 
preparedness and national mobilization for organs taking part in 
national defense, and coordinate the local implementation of 
such tasks; 
  d. designate real property required in case of mobilization 
by the armed forces and by law and order organs enumerated in 
Paragraph 65.1., as well as by other organs involved in national 
defense, and notify the respective mayors accordingly; 
  e. establish obligations for service and supply provisions 
at the local level; 
  f. establish operating conditions for defense 
administrative organs under extraordinary and emergency 
conditions, and direct the implementation of tasks delegated 
under their jurisdiction by extraordinary measures; 
  g. based on Government approval, may conduct exercises 
involving mayors and organs participating in national defense 
efforts, to practice and control the performance of tasks 
involved in preparing for national defense and national 
mobilization. 
  16.2. In the course of planning and implementing 
the tasks defined in Paragraph 16.1., defense committees may 
request certain personal and other data specified by law from 
mayors, organs participating in national defense efforts, 
authorities possessing data, and from organs authorized to 
gather data. Data thus acquired shall not be used for other 
purposes. The organ possessing the data shall provide the 
requested data. 
  The local defense committee 
  17.1. Local defense committees shall operate in 
the various districts of Budapest, in cities empowered to 
exercise the authority of counties, and in cities designated by 
defense committees. 
  17.2. The areas of jurisdiction of local defense 
committees (hereinafter: national defense sectors) shall be 
determined by the defense committee having jurisdiction, in due 
regard to views expressed by the respective mayors. 
  17.3. Mayors of settlements within a national 
defense sector shall be entitled to consult with local defense 
committees in the course of performing their work. 
  17.4. Local defense committees shall be corporate 
bodies. The mayors of cities empowered to exercise the authority 
of counties, cities, and of Budapest districts shall be the 
chairmen of local defense committees. 
  The membership of local defense committees shall be composed 
of the following: 
  a. the clerks of cities empowered to exercise the authority 
of counties, of cities, and of Budapest districts; 
  b. a mayor elected by mayors of cities within the national 
defense districts to which they belong; 
  c. the heads of law and order organs designated by the 
Government, and centrally directed organs having jurisdiction in 
the given national defense district; 
  d. the head, or lacking a head, the spokesman of the local 
autonomous minority government operating in the city empowered 
to exercise the authority of a county, the city, the Budapest 
District, or the national defense district. 
  18.1. Local defense committees shall be state 
administrative organs subordinate to the central government, and 
shall direct and streamline the performance of local functions 
related to national defense preparedness and national 
mobilization within national defense districts. 
  18.2. Local defense committees shall 
  a. direct and streamline preparations for, and the 
implementation of administrative tasks related to mobilization 
and manpower replacement; 
  b. take part in the direction of the national defense tasks 
performed by local organs; 
  c. organize and streamline tasks related to civil defense 
and public supplies; 
  d. streamline the performance of obligations to provide 
services and supplies within the national defense district; 
  e. direct the development and operation of the information 
system needed for the performance of the national defense tasks 
within the national defense district; and 
  f. take part in the implementation of local tasks to be 
performed in response to extraordinary measures. 
  18.3. The expenditures incurred by, and the 
operating costs of local defense committees shall be paid for 
from funds appropriated for the performance of certain national 
defense tasks to cities empowered to exercise the authority of 
counties, cities, and to the autonomous governments of Budapest 
districts and from targeted support funds; and from standard 
state subsidies allocated to settlements within national defense 
districts in proportion to the size of the population for the 
performance of national defense tasks. 
  The mayor 
  19.1. Within their areas of jurisdiction, mayors 
shall perform tasks related to national defense preparation and 
national mobilization as assigned by law and Government decree, 
and shall direct and streamline the local performance of these. 
  19.2. To perform national defense tasks, mayors 
shall 
  a. establish the necessary conditions for the performance 
of the functions of an authority related to national defense 
obligations, as well of other public administrative functions; 
  b. organize and direct preparations for public 
administrative tasks related to the manpower replacement and 
mobilization of the armed forces, an the implementation of these; 
  c. direct civil defense tasks to be performed under their 
authority; 
  d. streamline the activities of local organs participating 
in national defense work; 
  e. order the use of real property and technical means under 
their authority, and the performance of other obligations to 
provide services and supplies; 
  f. take part in the operation of the information system 
needed for the performance of national defense tasks within the 
national defense district; 
  g. take part in the organizing and performance of local 
tasks of mobilizing the economy; and shall 
  h. direct the implementation of local tasks in response to 
extraordinary measures. 
  19.3. As required by local defense committees, 
mayors shall cooperate with the mayors of other settlements to 
complete the tasks described in Paragraph 19.1. 
  19.4. To perform the tasks described in Paragraph 
19.1., mayors may request personal and other data pursuant to 
law from citizens, and organs or authorities possessing such 
data. Provision of such data shall not be refused. Data thus 
acquired shall only be used to plan and implement the tasks of 
national defense preparation and national mobilization. 
  19.5. The administrative tasks of national defense 
assigned to the mayors shall be performed in Budapest by the 
chief clerk, in cities, the districts of Budapest, and in towns 
by the clerk or circuit clerk (hereinafter jointly: clerk) with 
the involvement of the mayor's office. All employees of the 
mayor's office may be obligated to perform unlimited overtime 
work as necessary, to complete the national defense and national 
mobilization tasks. 
  19.6. Unless excepted by law, the costs of 
performing the mayors' tasks and the expenses incurred shall be 
paid from standard state subsidies received. 
  The local organization of military 
administration 
  20.1. Selective service commands shall be the 
local military administrative organizations. 
  20.2. Within their respective areas of 
jurisdiction, and within the framework established by law, 
selective service commands shall perform national defense 
administrative tasks related to supplementing the armed forces 
personnel, mobilization as provided for in Paragraph 37, 
compliance with obligations to provide services and supplies, 
and the protection of the social welfare of persons subject to 
military service, the retired members of the Honved Forces, as 
well as their family members, and further, shall be involved in 
implementing the national defense tasks of defense 
administrative organs. 
<H6>  Chapter III </H6>
  THE ARMED FORCES OF THE HUNGARIAN REPUBLICAND 
THE APPLICABLE RULES 
  The armed forces 
  21.1. The Honved Forces and the Border Guard shall 
be the armed forces of the Hungarian Republic. 
  21.2. The Honved Forces shall be a regular army 
based on general, compulsory military service, and on a skeleton 
staff system. 
  21.3. In the framework of its regulatory 
functions, the Border Guard shall guard the state's borders, 
control border traffic, and maintain order at the borders. 
Detailed rules applicable to the Border Guard are contained in 
separate law. 
  The functions of the armed forces 
  22.1. The armed forces shall: 
  a. defend with arms the territory, independence, populace, 
and material assets of Hungary against external attacks; 
  b. guard and defend the state borders; 
  c. defend the country's air space; 
  d. participate in averting violent actions committed by 
armed persons or with arms, as defined in Paragraph 40/B.2. of 
the Constitution; 
  e. perform military obligations called for in international 
agreements (and thus, particularly in the UN Charter); 
  f. guard and defend objects requiring increased protection 
based on national defense considerations; 
  g. take part in the performance of civil defense tasks; 
  h. provide assistance in case of natural disasters, 
industrial accidents, threats to the public, disturbances in the 
operation of plants delivering public services, or other 
catastrophes of significant magnitude; 
  i. participate in providing humanitarian aid; 
  j. take part on a compensatory basis in functions requiring 
military expertise or special technical means; 
  k. perform on a compensatory basis construction and other 
work for state organs. 
  22.2. Regarding armed forces involvement pursuant 
to Paragraph 22.1.d., the purpose and duration of the use of 
armed forces, and the tasks, size, and means (armament) of the 
deployed forces, as well as the geographical limits of the 
deployment shall be specified. Forces deployed shall perform 
tasks under the leadership of their commanders. 
  22.3. The functions described in Paragraphs 
22.1.h.-k. shall be performed by the armed forces without using 
armaments. 
  22.4. Upon request, and with the permission of the 
minister of defense, the transportation vehicles and technical 
machinery--not including combat vehicles and armaments--may be 
yielded temporarily, based on agreements, for the performance of 
legally required tasks of state and other organs. 
  23. Regarding functions described in Paragraphs 
22.1.h.-k. the commander of the Honved Forces may authorize the 
use of up to 100 members of the Honved Forces for a period not 
exceeding 21 days. Permission by the minister of defense shall 
be required for the use of more than 100 persons or for a time 
period exceeding 21 days. If more than 3,000 members of the 
Honved Forces are used, the minister of defense shall inform the 
National Assembly at the time he grants permission. 
  24.1. When extraordinary conditions prevail, the 
commander of the Honved Forces shall have authority to provide 
leadership to certain Border Guard units specified in the 
defense plan. The chief of staff of the Honved Forces shall 
establish requirements for preparing Border Guard units for 
military defense functions. 
  24.2. The Honved Staff shall continually monitor 
Border Guard compliance with the requirement specified in 
Paragraph 24.1. 
  Commands; the authority to issue orders 
  25.1. Soldiers shall perform military service in 
the framework of a system of subordination that prevails at the 
armed forces. In this system, a soldier, whose authority and 
duty is to direct the activities of other soldiers, shall be the 
superior in the chain of command, and the one subject this 
authority, the subordinate. The superior in the chain of command 
shall enforce his will by issuing individual and standard orders 
(commands, measures). 
  25.2. A superior in the chain of command having 
general authority shall be the superior in the service, his 
subordinate soldiers shall be the subordinates in the service. 
  25.3. From among several soldiers in one group, 
the one with the highest level assignment shall be the ranking 
soldier. In case of identical assignments, the higher ranking 
soldier shall be the ranking soldier; in case of identical 
ranks, the one who acquired the rank earlier shall be the 
ranking soldier; in case the identical ranks were acquired at 
the same time, the older one shall be the ranking soldier. 
  25.4. Among soldiers not subject to subordination, 
the higher ranking soldier shall be superior to the lower 
ranking soldier. 
  25.5. An enlisted man without rank shall be 
neither the superior in the chain of command of, nor superior in 
service to a soldier who began his service later than he did. 
  26.1. An order is an individual instruction to 
perform a certain activity or task. 
  26.2. An order may be issued to a person or to a 
clearly defined group of persons. 
  26.3. Individual decisions concerning military 
organizations and personnel shall also be conveyed in the form 
of orders. 
  26.4. An order, or a document prepared on the 
basis of an order, shall be handed or delivered to a soldier in 
writing if the contents of the order deal with 
  a. 
  -- termination of service relationship (discharge), 
  -- promotion, 
  -- disciplinary action, except for reprimand and rebuke; 
  b. in cases involving professional soldiers, in addition to 
the contents enumerated in Subsection a. above: 
  -- the grant of professional status, 
  -- appointment to a different assignment, 
  -- transfer, 
  -- assignments for periods longer than 30 days, 
  -- disciplinary action, 
  -- commendation. 
  27.1. The superior in the service may issue to his 
subordinates any order under his scope of authority, unless 
prohibited by law. 
  27.2. If several soldiers pursue joint service 
activities, and if none of them has been designated as the 
commander, the ranking soldier shall take command, and shall 
have authority to issue orders to the extent necessary for the 
performance of the task. 
  27.3. The commander of a military police patrol, 
under his authority established by separate legal provision, may 
issue orders to a soldier found in violation of rules, in order 
to maintain and restore order. 
  27.4. A soldier superior in rank may command a 
soldier lower in rank to discontinue violating rules, or to the 
extent necessary, to file a complaint, if the soldier 
  a. commits a crime or rules violation; 
  b. leaves his duty post without permission; 
  c. abandons his route while on courier duty or consumes an 
alcoholic beverage; 
  d. violates the rules of military courtesy and respect; 
  e. violates requirements to wear the uniform; or 
  f. talks or manifests noisy and overbearing conduct in the 
presence of others, coarsely offending public morals. 
  28.1. A soldier issuing an order shall be 
responsible for the order he issues. Abusing the authority of 
issuing an order shall be prohibited. 
  28.2. The person issuing an order shall ascertain 
the feasibility of implementing the order, and shall verify the 
implementation of the order as necessary. 
  28.3. Orders shall be consistent with legal and 
other requirements and with orders issued by superiors in the 
chain of command. 
  28.4. No order shall be issued for the unjustified 
harassment, or the violation of the human dignity of 
subordinates. 
  28.5. No order shall be be issued, if the order 
  a. directly or gravely endangers the life, health, or 
physical integrity of a soldier, except as provided for in this 
Law; 
  b. aims for realizing a criminal act; 
  c. results in the use of a soldier for private purposes. 
  28.6. Legal provisions shall establish basic rules 
for the method of issuing orders. 
  Instructions 29.1. The specialized, 
technical or procedural rules for implementing certain regularly 
reoccurring activities, including the operating order of 
military organizations and issues pertaining to general 
arrangements of the everyday activities of personnel may be 
provided in the form of instructions, to the extent that such 
matters are not dealt with in legal provisions. 
  29.2. Instructions shall not conflict with legal 
provisions or with directives received from the minister; 
instructions shall not pertain to matters subject to 
legislation, and shall not increase the difficulty of exercising 
rights or taking advantage of entitlements provided for by law. 
  29.3. Legal provisions may mandate the issuance of 
instructions. 
  30.1. Unit commanders, or higher level commanders, 
and superiors in the chain of command in a given field of 
activity shall be authorized to issue instructions. 
  30.2. A superior in the chain of command, with 
authority to give instruction only within his own technical 
field for the realization of the will of the service superior in 
the chain of command [as published], shall be the technical 
superior in the chain of command, and those subject to this 
authority shall be the technical subordinates. 
  30.3. If the person authorized to issue 
instructions is impeded in doing so, his deputy may issue 
instructions, unless otherwise ordered by the authorized person. 
  30.4. The authority of instructions given by the 
service superior in the chain of command shall extend to all or 
part of the personnel under his command. The authority of 
instructions given by the technical superior shall extend to the 
technical subordinates or to all or some of the non-military 
personnel performing the given technical activity under the 
leadership of the technical superior in the chain of command. 
  Notice of, familiarization with instructions 
  31.1. Except for instructions containing state 
secrets, instructions given by the commander of the Honved 
Forces and the commander of the Border Guard which apply, or 
could apply under specified conditions to all Honved or Border 
Guard personnel, shall be published in the official journal of 
the Ministry of Defense and the Ministry of the Interior 
respectively. 
  31.2. Instructions not referred to in Paragraph 
31.1., issued by the commander of the Honved Forces, the 
national commander of the Border Guard, or the technical 
superior in the chain of command belonging to the command may 
also be published in the official journal of the ministry. The 
person issuing the instruction shall decide whether to publish 
the instruction. 
  31.3. If an instruction by the commander of the 
Honved Forces, the national commander of the Border Guard, or 
the technical superior in the chain of command belonging to the 
command is not published, the serial number and title of the 
instruction shall be published in the official journal of the 
ministry. 
  31.4. Regarding instructions published or 
communicated pursuant to Paragraph 31.3. and annulled because of 
conflict with legal provisions, the fact of annulment shall also 
be published in the official journal. 
  31.5. Instructions referred to in Paragraphs 31.1. 
and 31.3. not published shall be communicated to the heads of 
affected military organs, who, in turn, shall provide for 
briefing or instructing the personnel affected by the 
instructions in a manner prescribed in the instructions or by 
law. 
  31.6. Except for instructions containing state 
secrets, instructions applicable to persons serving military 
duty as part of their military obligation shall be informed of 
the instructions, or of the essence of instructions having a 
direct impact on them, and in particular, of instructions 
affecting the functioning of the military organization, and the 
daily activities of the military organization. The text of the 
instruction shall be given to such personnel, upon request. 
  32. The minister having jurisdiction may establish 
detailed rules for the preparation and editing of instructions, 
and regarding the manner in which personnel shall be briefed, 
and in which personnel may comment on instructions. He may 
require that draft instructions be reviewed by him or by some 
superior in the chain of command, in order to issue the 
instruction showing his or some superior's advance approval. 
  Use of weapons and means of coercion under 
extraordinary and emergency conditions 
  33.1. The armed forces use weapons and means of 
coercion while engaged or deployed under emergency conditions 
pursuant to the Constitution. 
  33.2. From the standpoint of the commander of the 
Honved Forces, the national commander of the Border Guard, or, 
of any person in the service, an instruction based on a decision 
pursuant to Paragraph 33.1. shall qualify as a command from the 
standpoint of legal consequences. 
  Use of weapons and means of coercion in times of 
peace 
  34.1. Armed forces may use weapons or other means 
of coercion in times of peace, to an extent absolutely 
necessary, and pursuant to conditions specified by law 
  a. in case of an attack endangering the security of a 
guarded facility, persons, or objects, and further, in the 
course of an illegal penetration of such facilities, while on 
duty, or in the course of performing guard, courier, or other 
armed service; 
  b. in case of an attack on armed forces facilities or 
facilities guarded by the armed forces, which endanger the 
security of the facility, and which cannot be repelled by 
service personnel mentioned in Subsection a. above; 
  c. while on military police duty, if attacked, or if his 
lawful action is physically resisted; 
  d. while guarding a prisoner, if the prisoner attacks the 
guard or attempts to escape (break out); 
  e. in case of an unexpected external armed attack pursuant 
to Paragraph 19/E. of the Constitution, until a decision is 
reached to promulgate extraordinary or emergency conditions. 
  34.2. In cases described in Paragraphs 34.1.b. or 
34.1.e., the attack (violation of air space) shall be reported 
pursuant to law or other measure without delay to the minister 
having jurisdiction. The Government shall report without delay 
the events and the action taken to the National Assembly and the 
president of the Republic. 
  34.3. The Border Guard shall be authorized to use 
weapons or means of coercion in the performance of is duties, in 
cases other than those described in Paragraph 34.1., but only as 
provided for by applicable law, and other legal provisions. 
  Mobilizing, and placing the armed forces in a 
heightened state of combat readiness 
  35.1. The minister of defense, and the minister of 
the interior, respectively, shall render decisions concerning 
the placement of the armed forces in a heightened state of 
combat readiness, while simultaneously reporting such decisions 
to the Government. 
  35.2. The commander of the Honved Forces, and the 
national commander of the Border Guard, respectively, shall take 
action to achieve the heightened state of combat readiness. 
  35.3. Verifying the heightened state of combat 
readiness of Honved troops may be ordered pursuant to an annual 
plan approved by the commander of the Honved Forces, along with 
advance notice to the minister of defense. 
  36.1. The minister of defense and the minister of 
the interior, respectively, shall take action to mobilize the 
armed forces based on a decision pursuant to Paragraphs 5.2. and 
8.1.d. Commands to mobilize shall be issued by the commander of 
the Honved Forces and the national commander of the Border 
Guard, respectively. 
  36.2. The minister of the interior shall have 
authority to order the implementation of mobilization tasks 
related to the provisions of Paragraphs 5.2. and 8.1.d., with 
respect to public administrative organs. 
  36.3. Unexpected mobilization exercises in times 
of peace may be order on the basis of the annual plan approved 
by the Government. 
  Implementing mobilization 
  37.1. Selective service commands shall prepare 
orders for persons of military age with residential addresses 
within their respective jurisdictions, to call up reservists and 
for the provision of civilian technical implements, and shall 
forward such commands to public administrative organs having 
jurisdiction, and to persons [and legal entities] owning or 
possessing the implements. 
  37.2. Police headquarters and district police 
stations shall be involved in performing the alerting functions 
related to mobilization, in forwarding the related information 
to public administrative organs, and in securing the assembly 
and transportation of reservists. 
  37.3. The clerk of the autonomous municipal 
government, with the cooperation of postal service organs, shall 
organize the delivery, and deliver the commands to report for 
duty and to produce implements, and shall provide for the 
assembly of reservists, and their transportation to induction 
centers. Employees of organs involved in performing these tasks 
shall do so as part of their work related duties. The clerk 
shall prepare orders to ensure a state of preparedness to 
mobilize. 
  37.4. Those who own or possess civilian technical 
implements and facilities designated for use in the mobilization 
of the armed forces shall deliver and transfer (grant possession 
of) such implements and facilities in a manner, and at a time 
and place specified by the requisitioning authority. 
  Public notice of general mobilization and the 
civilian air raid warning system 
  38.1. If Hungary is subject to an unexpected 
attack, or in case of an imminent danger of such an attack, 
mandatory public notice of ordering general mobilization shall 
be given by all radio and television broadcast stations 
operating in Hungary, in a report filed by the Hungarian 
Telegraph Agency [MTI], and through public announcements. If 
mobilization is ordered in this manner, reservists shall report 
for induction pursuant on commands they hold. Technical 
implements designated for use shall be transferred pursuant to 
transfer commands held by the operators of plants. 
  38.2. In case of an unexpected air attack, the 
population of the affected area shall be alerted by operating 
the warning systems, and through radio and television broadcasts 
specified in Paragraph 38.1. 
<H6>  Chapter IV </H6>
  DETAILED RULES PERTAININGTO THE HONVED FORCES 
  The organization of the Honved Forces 
  39.1. The Honved Forces shall consist of various 
types of military forces, and within those, of armed branches 
and specialized troops. Leadership organs, troops, institutions, 
and military administrative organs shall comprise the 
organization of the Honved Forces. 
  39.2. Military organizations specified by the 
minister of defense shall be legal entities. 
  The leadership of the Honved Forces 
  40.1. The Honved Forces shall be headed in times 
of both peace and war by the commander of Honved Forces. He 
shall be the superior in the service of all Honved personnel. 
The commander of the Honved Forces shall be responsible for the 
combat readiness, preparedness and training, and every aspect of 
functioning of the Honved Forces, as well as for the personnel's 
high level discipline. 
  40.2. Under the leadership of the chief of staff 
of the Honved Forces, the Honved Staff plans and organizes the 
country's preparation for military defense, as well as the 
activities of the armed forces. The chief of staff of the Honved 
Forces shall be the superior in the service of all Honved 
personnel, except of the commander of Honved Forces. 
  40.3. Assignments to the positions of commander of 
the Honved Forces and chief of staff of the Honved Forces may be 
made to one and the same person. 
  40.4. The commander and chief of staff of the 
Honved Forces shall exercise leadership authority according to, 
and within the framework of acts governing executive organs, and 
shall issue commands accordingly. 
  41. Under his leadership authority, the commander 
of the Honved Forces shall 
  a. develop a plan for the country's armed defense, and 
shall submit the same to the minister of defense; and shall 
participate in the development of the basic principles of 
national defense; 
  b. provide rules for the order of placing the Honved Forces 
in a higher state of combat readiness and of mobilization; 
  c. plan and manage the manpower supplement and replacement 
of the Honved Forces, and the claiming of real and movable 
property needed for mobilization; 
  d. develop the order of preparing and training the Honved 
Forces, and ensure the implementation and preparation and 
training; 
  e. submit to the minister of defense for the minister of 
the interior the requirements of Border Guard military defense 
preparations; 
  f. develop, and submit to the minister of defense needs and 
plans with respect to Honved personnel--and within that, 
proportionate numbers of personnel, the Honved organization, 
equipment, and the preparation of the country's territory for 
military operations, and ensures their implementation; 
  g. take part in ensuring the proper functioning of 
transportation and communication networks from the standpoint of 
the ability of the Honved Forces to perform their functions, as 
well as of the air warning and radiation monitoring, signaling 
and alarm systems; 
  h. organize and ensure pursuant to the orders of the 
minister of defense the fulfillment of military obligations 
stemming from international agreements; and represent the Honved 
Forces in establishing international relations; 
  i. exercise his authority with respect to personnel 
affairs, as provided for by law; 
  j. based on requirements established by the minister of 
defense, prepare a proposed budget for the Honved Force, provide 
for the utilization of budget projections pursuant to law, and 
prepare the annual budget report; 
  k. organize and manage the material-technical, 
transportation, financial, and health care needs and provisions 
of the Honved Forces, provide for appropriate living, service, 
and work conditions for the personnel; 
  l. plan and organize tasks related to communications, 
mechanized guidance [obscure term: "vezetesgepesites"], and 
automation in the interest of leadership; 
  m. issue commands, specialized directives, and other 
internal directives applicable to the Honved Forces, as 
specified by the minister of defense; 
  n. establish detailed rules for occupational safety and 
accident prevention to be observed by Honved personnel and as 
specified by law; provide for the realization of requirements 
established by interest groups pursuant to law, and maintain 
relations with various organs that protect or represent 
interests; 
  o. determine criteria for ongoing scientific work within 
the Honved Forces; 
  p. provide for the protection of state and official secrets 
at the Honved Forces; 
  r. exercise authority delegated to him by virtue of decree 
by the minister of defense, and performs tasks assigned to him 
by the minister of defense. 
  The leadership of military organizations 
  42.1. The commander shall be the sole person who 
heads the military organization, and shall be the superior in 
the service, and superior of all personnel within the military 
organization. 
  42.2. The service power of the commander shall 
extend to all areas of operation within the military 
organization. He shall hold full and indivisible responsibility 
for the combat readiness of the military organization, the 
preparation and training of the personnel, for ensuring 
operational capability in every respect, and for the high level 
discipline of the personnel, as well as for everything he has 
done or has failed to do to accomplish the above. 
  The personnel of the Honved Forces 
  43. The personnel of the Honved Forces shall 
consist of active duty soldiers, reservists of military age, 
public officials, and public employees. 
  The active duty military personnel 
  44.1. The following shall comprise the active duty 
military personnel: 
  a. professional soldiers, 
  b. reenlisted and contractual soldiers; 
  c. enlisted, reserve, and auxiliary reserve soldiers 
performing military duty, and further, 
  d. students attending military educational institutions. 
  44.2. A separate law concerning the legal status 
of active duty military personnel shall establish their service 
relationship. 
  Supplementing the active duty military personnel 
  45.1. Members of the active duty military 
personnel shall perform military duty on the basis of compulsory 
or voluntary enlistment for military service, depending on the 
origination of service relationship. 
  45.2. The continuous replacement of the active 
duty military personnel shall be accomplished as a result of the 
induction of persons of military age, admission to the ranks of 
professional soldiers, and through the admission of persons 
volunteering to reenlist or to serve under contract. 
  Professional, reenlisted, and contractual 
personnel 
  46.1. Professional service relationship shall be 
established for an indefinite period of time; reenlisted and 
contractual service relationship shall be established for a 
fixed period of time. 
  46.2. Reenlisted and contractual soldiers shall 
receive specific military assignments, and shall be able to 
attain commensurate ranks. 
  46.3. On a voluntary basis, women may also perform 
professional, reenlisted, and contractual military service in 
functions specified by the minister of defense. 
  Reserve and auxiliary reserve personnel 
  47. Reserve personnel shall consist of persons 
discharged from enlisted military service, trained as auxiliary 
reservists, dismissed and retired personnel, and reserve status 
professional, reenlisted, and contractual personnel; auxiliary 
reserve personnel shall consist of untrained persons subject to 
military service, beyond the compulsory military age. 
  Students attending military educational 
institutions 
  48. Student attending military educational 
institutions, including students attending foreign military 
educational institutions, prepare themselves for professional 
military careers pursuant to separate law. 
  Military oath and pledge 
  49.1. Professional, reenlisted, contractual 
personnel, as well as persons performing armed military service 
based on compulsory military duty shall take an oath, persons 
performing unarmed military duty shall make a pledge. 
  49.2. The texts of the oath and the pledge are 
specified in the appendix to this Law. 
  Public officials and public employees 
  50.1. The law providing for the legal status of 
public officials and public employees shall apply to the legal 
relationship of public officials and public employees. 
  50.2. Public officials and public employees shall 
perform tasks which do not require the establishment of active 
duty military service relationships, establishing peculiar 
requirements relative to soldiers. 
  Military service relationship 
  51.1. The military service relationship shall be a 
legal relationship established between the state and active duty 
soldiers for the armed defense of the homeland, in which armed 
service is performed in a strict order of subordination amid 
increased endangerment. 
  51.2. The service relationship of professional 
soldiers shall be based on voluntary application for the purpose 
of performing military service as a lifelong career avocation, 
and shall be a special public service legal relationship for an 
indefinite period of time. 
  51.3. The reenlisted and contractual military 
service relationships shall be based on voluntary application 
for the purpose of assisting professional soldiers, to fill 
certain command posts, and to perform specialized service 
duties, and shall constitute a legal relationship for a definite 
period of time. 
  51.4. The enlisted, reserve, and auxiliary reserve 
military service relationship shall be a unilateral legal 
relationship established by the state based on the general, 
compulsory military national defense duty to perform military 
service, including training, retraining, continued training, 
exercise, special service and unarmed service. 
  51.5. The service relationship of students 
attending military educational institutions shall be based on 
voluntary applications and training contracts, and shall 
constitute a legal relationship for the purpose of pursuing 
studies in the framework of military service. 
  52.1. In the framework of the professional, 
reenlisted, and contractual military service relationships, the 
authority to be applied in the course of service shall be 
consistent with the scope of authority defined in the 
Constitution and this Law (hereinafter: personnel affairs 
authority), and shall be exercised on behalf of the state by the 
president of the Republic, the Government, the minister of 
defense, and relative to delegated authority, by the superior in 
the chain of command. 
  52.2. Except as provided for in Paragraph 7.1.b., 
the Government shall exercise personnel authority over the 
commander and chief of staff of the Honved Forces. 
  52.3. The minister of defense shall be entitled to 
admit professional personnel, and to determine their initial 
ranks and assignments; except for making the initial appointment 
at an officer's rank, the minister of defense may delegate this 
authority. 
  52.4. The minister of defense shall appoint and 
relieve service personnel assigned to positions requiring the 
rank of a general, as well as the personnel of the Ministry of 
Defense and its directly related organs, with the exception of 
Ministry of Defense state secretaries. The minister of defense 
may delegate personnel authority over the personnel of the 
Ministry of Defense and its directly related organs. 
  52.5. The commander of the Honved Forces shall 
appoint and relieve service personnel in Honved organizations 
assigned to positions whose qualification criteria require the 
holding of the rank of a colonel. 
  52.6. The minister of defense shall be authorized 
to make promotions in rank; except for promoting to the rank of 
a colonel, the minister of defense may delegate this authority. 
  The fundamental duties of the soldier 
  53.1. Based on the service relationship specified 
in Paragraphs 51.1.-5., soldiers shall be obligated to perform 
the following tasks: 
  a. except for limitation provided in Paragraph 53.2., 
participate in the performance of tasks enumerated in Paragraph 
22.1; 
  b. prepare for the military defense of the homeland, and 
participate in the related, necessary training (exercise), 
retraining, and continued training; 
  c. provide guard, on duty, preparedness, alert, courier, 
and military police services; 
  d. take part in the performance of work required for the 
functioning of the military organization. 
  53.2. Except for participating in exercises, the 
performance of military tasks abroad in times of peace, and the 
provision of assistance pursuant to Paragraphs 22.1.j. and 
22.1.k., shall be conditioned by the soldiers' consent. 
  54.1. Soldiers shall perform their service duties 
pursuant to legal and other provisions, consistent with commands 
received and with their oath. 
  54.2. Soldiers shall perform on command without 
contradiction, at the appropriate time, fully, and to the best 
of their knowledge. 
  54.3. A soldier shall refuse performing a command, 
if it becomes apparent to the soldier that performing the 
command would materialize a criminal act. 
  55.1. Soldiers shall respect international rules 
concerning warfare and the protection of victims of war, and 
further, provisions related to the protection of the populace, 
tangible assets, and the environment. 
  55.2. Soldiers shall protect their weapons and 
equipment, and shall use those only for their designated 
purposes. 
  55.3. Soldiers shall respect the rights of their 
comrades in arm, as those relate to human dignity, and shall aid 
their comrades in arm in emergency and dangerous situations. 
  55.4. Soldiers shall keep state and official 
secrets. 
  55.5. Soldiers shall report facts and 
circumstances related to the performance of service duties in a 
manner consistent with reality. 
  The fundamental rights of soldiers 
  56.1. In the framework of the service 
relationship, soldiers shall be entitled to the following: 
  a. service and living conditions, placement and 
compensation that are appropriate from the standpoint of their 
assignments; 
  b. military training, continued training or retraining 
(hereinafter: continued training) to enable service performance 
and advancement; 
  c. to acquire professional military knowledge for the 
performance of assignments, and further, familiarity with legal 
requirements, environmental protection, fire safety, accident 
prevention, and occupational safety; 
  d. to receive health care and medical care, and further, 
welfare (social welfare) care as specified by law; 
  e. protection of rights and appropriate interests; 
  f. pious care in case of death; 
  56.2. Depending on their legal status in the 
service, soldiers shall be able to exercise the following 
fundamental rights, within limits established in the law 
concerning the legal status of soldiers. The right to: 
  a. freedom and personal security; 
  b. free movement, and the free choice of a place to stay, 
including the right to freely choose one's place of residence 
and to leave the country; 
  c. freedom of conscience and religion; 
  d. the free expression of opinion; 
  e. assemble; 
  f. associate with others; 
  g. use and teach one's native language; 
  h. vote as that relates to National Assembly and local 
government elections; 
  i. freely choose one's work and occupation; 
  j. form and join organizations to protect economic and 
social interests; 
  k. pursue cultural endeavors; and the right to 
  l. the freedom of scientific and artistic life, and to the 
freedom of education and teaching. 
  57.1. Soldiers shall abstain from pursuing 
partisan political activities while performing their duties and 
related activities. 
  57.2. No political party function shall be held in 
barracks or in institutions operated by the Honved Forces. 
  57.3. Soldiers shall not pursue political 
propaganda work in barracks, nor shall they express views as 
representatives of, or on behalf of political organizations, nor 
shall they influence their subordinates for or against any 
political leaning by expressing opinions. 
  57.4. Soldiers shall not wear uniforms at 
political party functions. At political functions held outside 
the barracks, soldiers may wear uniforms only if they officially 
represent the military organization with the permission of the 
person in charge of personnel. 
  57.5. Soldiers shall not join any organization, 
whose organizational goal and activity is contrary to the 
function of the armed forces, as provided for by law. 
  57.6. Enlisted men, reservists, and members of the 
auxiliary reserve belonging to organizations whose purpose is 
contrary to the legally established functions of the armed 
forces shall suspend their membership, and cease pursuing the 
related activities for the duration of their military service. 
  Military ranks 
  58.1. Military ranks in the order of groups of 
personnel per rank: 
  a. no rank: 
  -- private, (sailor, border guard) 
  b. noncommissioned offices: 
  -- private first class, 
  -- corporal, 
  -- lance sergeant; 
  c. warrant officers: 
  -- sergeant, 
  -- sergeant first class, 
  -- sergeant major; 
  d. ensigns: 
  -- ensign, 
  -- ensign first class, 
  -- ensign major; 
  e. officers: 
  -- lieutenant, 
  -- first lieutenant, 
  -- captain; 
  f. field officers: 
  -- major, 
  -- lieutenant colonel, 
  -- colonel; 
  g. generals: 
  -- brigadier general, 
  -- major general, 
  -- lieutenant general, 
  -- colonel general. 
  58.2. Active officers, field officers and generals 
may use an adjective suggestive of the professional assignment 
that corresponds with their professional educational 
qualifications before their rank designation. Persons not having 
a service relationship, reservists and retirees shall also 
indicate their status before their rank designation, or the 
professional qualification stated jointly with their rank 
designation. 
  Waiting periods in various ranks 
  59.1. The waiting period [prior to promotion to 
the next rank] in the various ranks is as follows: 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|-- noncommissioned officers           |6 months                              | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|-- sergeants                          |3 years                               | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|-- sergeants first class              |4 years                               | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|-- sergeant majors                    |5 years                               | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|-- ensigns                            |6 years                               | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|-- ensigns first class                |7 years                               | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|-- lieutenants                        |3 years                               | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|-- first lieutenants                  |4 years                               | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|-- captains                           |5 years                               | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|-- majors                             |6 years                               | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  59.2. The waiting period for supersonic aircraft 
navigation staff shall be reduced by one year in each category 
shown in Paragraph 59.1. 
  59.3. There shall be no waiting period relative to 
the ensign major, lieutenant colonel, colonel, and general ranks. 
  59.4. The waiting period for a lieutenant having 
completed his education in a civilian institution of higher 
education shall be based on the years spent on education: 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|for three years of study              |4 years                               | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|for four years of study               |3 years                               | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|for five years of study               |2 years                               | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|for six years of study                |1 year.                               | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  59.5. Fractions of academic years commenced shall 
be regarded as full academic years, if the period of study in an 
institution of higher education does not amount to a full year. 
  59.6. Relative to enlisted men, the waiting period 
for noncommissioned officers shall be three months. 
  Recognition of soldiers 
  60.1. A soldier may be recognized for outstanding 
service performance or for successful performance over an 
extended period of time. 
  60.2. The service superior in the chain of command 
shall have authority to recognize a soldier, or to initiate 
recognition. 
  61.1. Recognition may be awarded to a soldier in 
the following forms: 
  a. commendation in the form of command before the personnel 
of the military organization; 
  b. award leave for up to seven days; 
  c. monetary reward or reward in the form of an object, or 
recreation in Hungary or abroad; 
  d. personalized thread- [as published] or fire arm, memento; 
  e. laudatory awards; 
  f. special, nonscheduled promotion; 
  g. Service Sign; 
  h. decoration. 
  61.2. Separate legal provisions shall govern the 
conditions and order of awarding recognitions per Paragraph 61.1. 
  The disciplinary responsibility of soldiers 
  62.1. Unless a soldier's culpable (intentional or 
negligent) breach of his duty stemming from his service 
relationship, or of the rules of service order and discipline 
qualifies as a criminal act or a rules violation, his act shall 
be regarded as a violation of discipline. 
  62.2. Unless cause to exclude or terminate the 
holding to account of a soldier exists, the soldier in violation 
of disciplinary rules shall be held to account in a disciplinary 
proceeding. 
  62.3. A disciplinary proceeding shall be initiated 
even if the conduct providing grounds for the proceeding also 
violates the rules of service relationship for which criminal 
proceedings have been initiated against the soldier. 
  62.4. The purpose of holding to account a soldier 
is to protect the service order and discipline, and to deter the 
rest of the soldiers from violating the rules of discipline as a 
result of the detriment suffered pursuant to law by the soldier 
held to account. 
  Disciplinary actions 
  63.1. The following disciplinary action may be 
taken against soldiers: 
  a. reprimand (verbal); 
  b. rebuke (in writing); 
  c. withdrawal of authorized absence or leave for 3-21 days; 
  d. up to 21 days of detention to be spent in jail; 
  e. prohibition to wear the uniform; 
  f. extension of waiting period for promotion into the next 
rank by a period of six months to two years; 
  g. demotion to the next lower rank for a period of six 
months to two years; 
  h. assignment to a lower level of service; 
  i. termination of the service relationship with 
simultaneous placement into reserve status; 
  j. demotion. 
  63.2. The provisions of Paragraphs 63.1.c. and 
63.1.d. shall be applied only with respect to privates without 
rank and noncommissioned officers of military age; Paragraphs 
63.1.g. and 63.1.i. with respect to professional soldiers, 
reenlisted men and contractual soldiers; and Paragraph 63.1.e. 
with respect to retired soldiers. 
  63.3. With respect to persons of military age, the 
effective period for disciplinary action specified in Paragraph 
63.1.g. shall range from one to six months. 
  Fundamental rules for holding soldiers to account in 
the course of disciplinary action 
  64.1. Soldiers shall be entitled to defense in 
disciplinary proceedings initiated against them. Except in 
regard to disciplinary action taken by the president of the 
Republic, a soldier shall have the right to file a complaint 
seeking review of the disciplinary action, and the right to seek 
legal remedy in court against disciplinary action initiated by 
the minister of defense, and in cases specified in this Law. 
  64.2. The commander having jurisdiction over the 
personnel shall order the initiation of disciplinary proceedings. 
  64.3. In cases involving simple violations or 
violations of a lesser severity that can be judged on the basis 
of facts, soldiers serving compulsory military duty shall be 
held to account in the course of disciplinary proceedings by 
their company (battery) commanders; professional, reenlisted, 
and contractual soldiers by their battalion (division) 
commanders. 
  64.4. In cases not provided for in Paragraph 64.3, 
the commander in charge of personnel shall designate a three 
member board to investigate the case, when ordering the 
initiation of disciplinary proceedings. 
  64.5. Violations of discipline pursuant to 
Paragraph 64.4. shall be judged by the commander in charge of 
personnel. 
  64.6. Detailed rules for holding to account 
soldiers in disciplinary proceedings are governed by separate 
law concerning the legal status of soldiers, and by the Rules 
and Regulations of Military Service. 
<H6>  Chapter V </H6>
  OTHER ORGANS PARTICIPATINGIN NATIONAL DEFENSE 
  65.1. The police, the civilian national security 
services, the penal authorities, the customs and revenue 
service, the civil defense organs, as well as the state and 
local professional fire services (for purposes of this law, 
hereinafter jointly: law and order organs) shall participate in 
performing certain national defense and national mobilization 
tasks, in addition to performing their basic tasks pursuant to 
law. 
  65.2. Under authority established by law, and 
within their jurisdiction, law and order organs shall: 
  a. perform their specified tasks within the national 
defense preparation and national mobilization system; 
  b. protect the persons and facilities assigned to them; 
  c. support the armed forces in implementing certain 
national defense tasks; 
  d. take part in performing civil defense tasks; 
  e. take part in the implementation of extraordinary 
measures; 
  f. cooperate with local defense administrative organs in 
performing national defense and national mobilization tasks. 
  66.1. The following organs shall take part in 
performing certain tasks related to national defense preparation 
and national mobilization: 
  a. public administrative organs subordinate to the central 
government; 
  b. organs directed by autonomous local governments in 
settlements (hereinafter: local governments); 
  c. judicial organs; 
  d. organs performing health care and pharmaceutical supply 
functions; 
  e. educational, cultural and scientific institutions; 
  f. radio and television broadcast stations, and the MTI; 
  g. transportation, delivery, telecommunication, and news 
organs, and the organs of the postal service; 
  h. the central bank; 
  i. public supply and public service provider organs; and 
further, 
  j. any and all organs mandated by law to perform some 
national defense task or national defense obligation. 
  66.2. In the framework of performing their 
national defense and national mobilization tasks, organs 
enumerated in Paragraph 66.1. shall, within their areas of 
operation 
  a. prepare for the performance of their national defense 
tasks as specified by law; 
  b. perform their civil defense tasks; 
  c. continuously ensure the existence of operating 
conditions for the performance of their national defense tasks, 
including the necessary planning and preparatory activities; 
  d. provide for the defense of, and supplies for the 
populace, and for the maintenance of indispensable public 
services; 
  e. take part in providing national defense information to 
the public, and, if necessary, to warn the populace; 
  f. perform their obligations to provide services and 
tangible assets; and 
  g. take part in the implementation of extraordinary 
measures. 
  67. Within limitations established by law, the 
tasks and authority of organs participating in national defense 
shall be established by the Government, or by the minister 
dealing with a certain scope of activity, in agreement with the 
minister of defense. 
  68.1. Social organization may voluntarily take 
part in the performance of certain national defense tasks, in 
cooperation with defense administrative organs. 
  68.2. The Hungarian Red Cross shall take part in 
performing humanitarian tasks related to national defense, 
pursuant to international agreements. 
<H6>  Chapter VI </H6>
  NATIONAL DEFENSE OBLIGATIONS 
  The system of national defense obligations 
  69.1. In the interest of defending the homeland, 
and as a matter of a general national defense obligation, 
citizens shall perform personal services and contribute tangible 
assets. 
  69.2. As a personal national defense obligation, 
citizens shall be obligated to perform 
  a. compulsory military duty; 
  b. civil defense functions; and 
  c. work related to national defense. 
  69.3. Private persons irrespective of their 
citizenship, and further, legal entities, as well as not 
incorporated businesses and personal associations (hereinafter: 
mandatory providers) may be required to provide services and 
tangible assets specified in this law, in the form of 
contributing assets. 
  Compulsory military service 
  70.1. Based on the principle of general compulsory 
military service, every male of Hungarian citizenship residing 
within the territory of the Hungarian Republic shall be required 
to perform military service. Compulsory military service begins 
at age 17, and lasts until 31 December of the year in which the 
person required to perform military service becomes 50 years old 
(military age). 
  70.2. Compulsory military service includes the 
duties to 
  a. provide information (data); 
  b. register; 
  c. appear; and 
  d. serve. 
  The duty to provide information 
  71.1. Each year, using the personal data and 
residential address register of citizens, municipal clerks shall 
tally the names of all males holding Hungarian citizenship, with 
registered residential addresses within the jurisdiction of 
their respective local governments, and reaching the age of 17 
in the given year. For purposes of entering the data in the 
military records of persons of military age, the tally shall 
contain personal identification data, residential addresses, and 
health data needed to make preliminary determinations as to 
fitness to perform military service, as provided for in 
Paragraphs 73.1.A.-B. 
  71.2. Persons of military age shall provide data 
pursuant to Paragraph 71.1. to their respective municipal clerks. 
  71.3. Municipal clerks shall submit the data 
tallied each year to the selective service command prior to 31 
December. 
  72.1. The selective service command shall enter 
into the military register persons of military age with 
residences within the area of the command's jurisdiction in the 
year when they reach the age of 18. 
  72.2. To enable military registration, and to 
verify the recorded data, persons of military age shall provide 
to the selective service command having jurisdiction their 
personal identification, address, and other information needed 
for the planning and fulfillment of military and civilian 
service, as specified in Paragraphs 73.1.A.-E., and changes 
therein. 
  Permissible recorded data of persons of military 
age 
  73.1. To protect the rights, and to enforce the 
obligations of persons of military age, military records shall 
be permitted to contain the following data: 
  A. personal identification data: 
  a. given name(s) and family name; 
  b. date of birth; 
  c. place of birth; 
  d. mother's maiden name, given name(s) and family name(s); 
  e. personal identification code; 
  B. residential address data: 
  a. registered address; 
  b. place of stay; 
  C. second citizenship; 
  D. marital status; 
  E. data bearing on planning and fulfilling military or 
civilian service: 
  a. diseases affecting fitness for military or civilian 
service; 
  b. somatometric data (weight, height, chest measurements, 
etc.); 
  c. academic studies commenced and completed; 
  d. professional training; 
  e. occupation; 
  f. employer; 
  g. foreign language knowledge and degree of fluency; 
  h. drivers' license, category and expiration date; 
  i. date of birth of natural and step children, and 
adopted or cared for children in the household; 
  j. military service performed abroad, military training 
acquired, rank attained; 
  k. circumstances that give rise to the deferment 
(interruption) of military service; 
  l. foreign travel exceeding three months in duration; 
  F. physical or mental handicaps, confused personality; 
  G. guardianship affecting ability to act freely; 
  H. pathological addiction related to narcotics or to 
substances having a narcotic effect; 
  I. facts suggesting suicidal tendencies; 
  J. date of preliminary arrest; 
  K. ongoing criminal proceedings, primary and secondary 
sentences pronounced; 
  L. starting date of serving the sentence, expected date of 
release, date of release; 
  M. exemption from under detrimental legal consequences 
related to criminal background; 
  N. starting and completion date of national defense 
pre-training; 
  O. death; 
  P. emigration; 
  R. renunciation of citizenship; 
  S. service data: 
  a. type of service (armed or unarmed military, civilian), 
commencement, completion; 
  b. professional military training acquired; 
  c. rank attained; 
  d. place of military service (military organization); 
  e. titles, class grade, and professional practice 
acquired during service; 
  T. data needed for social security and social welfare 
service provisions: 
  (in case of entitlement due to an accident, illness or 
death) 
  a. date of discharge from service; 
  b. place where last served; 
  c. workplace prior to reporting for duty; 
  d. date and consequence of accident or illness, date and 
cause of death; 
  e. reason for discharge; 
  f. degree of fitness after discharge; 
  g. position, place of work; 
  h. registration number under which pension is paid; 
  i. starting date of recognized service; 
  j. degree of reduced working capacity; 
  k. financial condition. 
  73.2. The selective service command shall manage 
data pertaining to persons of military age. Personal 
identification data and service data specified in Paragraphs 
73.1.A. and 73.1.S. above respectively shall be retained for 
five years after the final year of military age to enable 
verification related to military service; data pertaining to the 
protection of interests, specified in Paragraph 73.1.T. above 
shall be retained for three years after the entitlement to 
protect a person's interest has ceased. Thereafter the selective 
service command shall forward the data to the Central Archives 
of the Hungarian Honved Forces. 
  73.3. Data pertaining to criminal proceedings, 
punishments, penal enforcement, and to exemption from under 
detrimental legal consequences related to criminal background, 
as specified in Paragraphs 73.1.J.-M. shall be deleted if such 
data has no significance from the standpoint of military service. 
  73.4. Military organizations may use the personal 
identification code as an internal designator in the mutual 
exchange of data, as well as in conjunction with personal data 
and residential addresses. 
  73.5. Selective service commands shall transfer 
the data of persons of military age for the duration of their 
military service to the military organization in which the 
person performs the service. If the person of military age 
receives permission to perform civilian service, the data 
specified in Paragraphs 73.1.A.a.-d, 73.1.B. and 73.1.D., as 
well as in Paragraphs 73.1.E.a., 73.1.E.c., 73.1.E.d., 
73.1.E.e., 73.1.E.g., and 73.1.E.h shall be transferred to the 
Ministry of Labor Affairs organ having jurisdiction. 
  73.6. In addition to data specified in Paragraph 
73.5., the selective service command may provide data only upon 
the request of the person of military age, or in cases and to 
organs prescribed by law. 
  Data provision for military record keeping 
  74.1. By using the personal identification code, 
the National Personal Data and Residential Address Records 
Office shall manage separately the data specified in Paragraph 
11.1. of Law No. 64 of 1992 concerning record keeping 
requirements relative to the personal data and residential 
addresses of citizens, as those pertain to persons of military 
age, members of the professional, reenlisted, and contractual 
personnel, and further, to public officials and public employees 
of the Ministry of Defense and at the Honved Forces. 
  74.2. The organs maintaining personal and 
residential address data shall continuously provide data to the 
selective service commands regarding persons becoming of 
military age until 1 December of the year prior to entering such 
persons in the military records, and to the data processing 
organ having jurisdiction at the Honved Staff, regarding changes 
in the data of persons already included in the military records. 
  74.3. Upon request by the selective service 
command, the institute for tuberculosis having jurisdiction 
shall provide information regarding the health records of 
persons of military age when their military records are 
established, and during their military service. 
  74.4. All institutions of the state health service 
shall arrange on a priority basis examinations for persons of 
military age referred to them to be examined by a specialist. 
The physician of the state health service shall communicate the 
results of the examination (diagnosis) to the selective service 
command on the determination that referred the persons subject 
to military service to a specialist. 
  75. Information concerning persons of military age 
shall be conveyed to the selective service command as follows: 
  a. health care institutions regarding 
  -- physical or mental handicaps, confused personality; 
  -- pathological addiction to narcotics or substances 
having a narcotic effect; 
  -- facts suggesting an inclination to commit suicide; 
  b. courts or municipal clerks regarding 
  -- guardianship affecting ability to act freely; or 
  -- temporary guardianship; 
  c. the Ministry of the Interior or the police organ having 
jurisdiction regarding 
  -- preliminary arrests; 
  -- primary and secondary sentences, and exemptions from 
under detrimental legal consequences resulting from criminal 
background; 
  -- emigration; 
  -- renunciation of citizenship; 
  d. penal enforcement organs regarding 
  -- the starting date of serving the sentence, expected 
date of release, date of release; 
  e. municipal clerks regarding 
  -- death; 
  f. training institutions regarding 
  -- the starting and completion date of military 
specialized pre-training; 
  g. the Ministry of Labor Affairs and county labor affairs 
centers regarding 
  -- the starting a completion date of civilian service, 
and the interruption of civilian service. 
  76.1. Except in cases described in Paragraphs 
76.2. and in 71.2., data shall be provided directly to the 
selective service command. 
  76.2. The National Personal Data and Residential 
Address Records Office shall provide data and changes in data of 
persons becoming of military age, and the Ministry of the 
Interior organ having jurisdiction shall provide data concerning 
primary and secondary punishments to which a person of military 
age has been sentenced, the exemption of a person of military 
age from under detrimental legal consequences resulting from his 
criminal background, emigration, and the renunciation of 
citizenship by persons of military age. Such data shall be 
provided to the selective service command through the central 
data processing organ of the Honved Staff having jurisdiction. 
  76.3. Rules pertaining to secret data shall be 
applied with respect to data specified in Paragraphs 73.1.E.-T. 
above. 
  76.4. Data specified in Paragraphs 74. and 75. 
above, as well as in Paragraph 76.2 shall be provided without 
reimbursement. 
  77.1. To enforce the national defense interests of 
the Hungarian Republic, the military national security services 
may proceed under their authority and jurisdiction established 
by law, and manage personal and special data of persons 
specified in Paragraph 74.1., and from among these, of persons 
of military age during their military service, based on 
Paragraphs 3.1.b., 3.2.b. and 3.2.c. of Law No. 58 of 1992 
concerning the protection of personal data and the recording of 
data of public interest. 
  77.2. The military national security services 
shall not inform the person whose data they manage of the fact 
that they manage his data, of past or present recipients of such 
data, and of the purpose of receiving data. 
  77.3. The military national security services 
shall release data from the data they manage as follows: 
  a. to the military and civilian national security services 
to exercise their authority and jurisdiction pursuant to law; 
  b. to the courts and prosecutors' offices for the 
administration of justice; \c. to the National Police Command 
for the persecution of crime; and \d. to the National Assembly 
commissioner on civil rights, and the commissioner on data 
protection pursuant to separate law applicable to these 
commissioners. 
  77.4. Data managers who provide data from among 
the data they manage to the military national security services, 
or who flag data in their records at the request of the military 
national security services, shall not inform the person whose 
data they released or flagged of the release of the data or of 
flagging the data. 
  77.5. When providing data to the military national 
security services, data managers mentioned in Paragraph 77.4. 
above shall ask only the date of requesting data, the name of 
the person whose data is requested, and the designation of the 
service that requests the data. 
  The duty to report 
  78.1. A person of military age shall report 
changes in his 
  a. residential address or place of stay; 
  b. name; 
  c. marital status; 
  d. number of children; 
  e. civilian specialized qualifications (e.g., acquisition 
of drivers' license); 
  f. occupation (assignment, type of work performed); 
  g. educational qualifications; and further, 
  h. the receipt of certificates attesting to familiarity 
with foreign languages (medium and high level language 
examinations). 
  78.2. Persons of military age declared fit for 
military service, and reservists subject to military service 
holding call-up orders shall report any travel abroad exceeding 
three months in duration. 
  78.3. The requirements specified in Paragraphs 
78.1. and 78.2. above shall not apply to persons of military 
age, who have discharged their duty to perform military service 
by completing civilian service, or who have been exempted by a 
selective service command from under the duty to serve. 
  79.1. Persons of military age shall report changes 
in their residential addresses to the municipal clerks having 
jurisdiction pursuant to applicable rules; other data specified 
in Paragraph 78. above shall be reported to the selective 
service command. 
  79.2. Persons of military age shall report changes 
in personal identification data (Paragraph 73.1.A.) within eight 
days after entering such changes in their personal 
identification documents, by presenting their personal 
identification documents. 
  79.3. Foreign travel exceeding three months in 
duration shall be reported to the selective service command at 
least eight days prior to the commencement of travel by 
completing a standard form designed for this purpose; return 
from abroad shall be reported within eight days after arrival. 
  79.4. Reporting requirements not mentioned in 
Paragraphs 79.1.-3. above, shall be satisfied in writing, or 
verbally, in case of personal appearance by the person or 
military age within eight days after the change occurred. 
Appropriate documents or authentic copies of such documents 
shall be attached to written reports of change, or shall be 
presented in case of personal appearance. 
  79.5. A close relative or legal representative may 
satisfy the reporting requirement, if the person of military age 
is incapable of doing so in person. 
  The duty to appear 
  80.1. Persons of military age shall appear at 
designated places and on specific dates if called upon to do so 
by a the municipal clerk or the selective service command to 
verify and reconcile the recorded data specified in Paragraph 
73.1. 
  80.2. Any persons whose military records have not 
been established prior to the age of 18 shall appear at the 
selective service command even if not called upon to do so. This 
duty shall prevail until the age of 50. 
  Draft 
  81.1. Persons of military age shall appear at the 
place and on the date designated in a notice issued by the 
selective service command in order to be drafted, or to have 
their fitness to perform military service determined. 
  81.2. Persons with the following characteristics 
shall be exempt from the duty to appear to be drafted: 
  a. paralyzed persons; 
  b. persons incapable of providing for themselves; 
  c. persons helpless due to mental or physical handicap; 
  d. deaf or mute, or deaf-mute persons; 
  e. blind persons, or persons whose one eye is missing; 
  f. persons under guardianship limiting their freedom to act 
(Paragraphs 13. and 16 of the Civil Code of Laws); and/or 
  g. persons fully unable to use any one of their limbs. 
  81.3. Prior to drafting, selective service 
commands shall inform in writing persons of military age 
concerning their national defense obligations and rights 
(including the right to, and manner of requesting unarmed or 
civilian service). 
  82.1. Drafting shall be performed by draft boards 
of the first and second instances. 
  82.2. The chairman of the draft board of the first 
instance shall be an officer designated by the commander of the 
selective service command, and its members shall be a public 
official designated by the mayor, a representative of the 
military organization interested in drafting, a draft physician 
specializing in internal medicine, a draft physician 
specializing in surgery, and a psychologist. Auxiliary 
personnel, as provided for by law, shall take part in the 
workings of the draft board. 
  82.3. The physician members of the draft board 
shall be designated by the head of the physicians' employer 
health care institution, or by the chief medical officer having 
jurisdiction, upon request by the commander of the selective 
service command. 
  82.4. Drafting shall take place twice a year, 
during the months of March and April, and September and October. 
Subsequent drafts may be held if necessary at other times, based 
on the decision of the commander of the selective service 
command. 
  83.1. Draft boards shall determine the fitness, 
assignment, and the planned date and place of induction of 
persons of military age in due regard to their health condition, 
personal characteristics, and training and education. 
  83.2. The fitness designations to be used in the 
course of drafting shall be as follows: "fit for military 
service," "temporarily unfit for military service," and "unfit 
for military service." 
  83.3. Criteria for the various fitness levels 
shall be established in a joint decree promulgated by the 
Minister of Defense and the Minister of Public Welfare; the 
requirements for various military assignments shall be 
determined by the chief of staff of the Honved Forces. 
  83.4. If, at the time of drafting the fitness of a 
person of military age cannot be determined due to a passing 
deficiency or illness, the recruitment board shall defer the 
service obligation of the person of military age for a certain 
period of time, and if necessary, shall order a medical 
follow-up examination. 
  83.5. In case of deferment of service obligation 
pursuant to Paragraph 83.4. above, the draft board may state in 
its determination the kind of medical treatment required to 
attain a condition of fitness. Persons subject to military 
service taking advantage of such medical treatment within six 
months from date of receipt of such determination shall be 
entitled to free of charge care pursuant to this Law. 
  83.6. If, after the expiration of the period of 
deferred service obligation, the draft board determines the 
continued existence of the deficiency or illness of the person 
of military age, but fails to find cause for declaring permanent 
unfitness, it shall order an additional medical follow-up 
examination for the anticipated date when the impediment to 
perform military service ceases, and shall extend the deferment 
of the service obligation until the follow-up examination is 
performed. 
  84.1. The draft board shall issue a determination 
concerning the results of the draft, and the text of the 
resolution shall be proclaimed by the chairman of the draft 
board. The determination shall be communicated in writing to the 
persons of military age who reported to the draft board. 
Provisions pertaining to fitness for military service in the 
determination shall be the only provisions subject to appeal. 
The beginning of the time period available for appeal shall be 
counted from the date when the determination is delivered to the 
affected person. The merits of the appeal shall be evaluated and 
judged by the health fitness examining institute of the Honved 
Forces, but the appeal itself shall be filed with the selective 
service command. The submission of a petition for judicial 
review of an affirmed determination of the second instance shall 
not delay the performance of enlisted military service, but the 
appellant may request the deferment of his induction as part of 
the petition. In other respects, the general rules of state 
administrative procedure shall apply to the proceedings. 
  84.2. The chairman of the draft board of the 
second instance shall be an officer designated by the chief of 
staff of the Honved Forces, and its members shall be a physician 
employed by the health care fitness examining institute of the 
Honved Forces, and the chief draft physician of the selective 
service command having jurisdiction at the residence of the 
person of military age. 
  84.3. Persons of military age may request the 
reexamination of their fitness for military service during the 
entire period of their military age, if a change in health 
conditions affecting their fitness for military service has 
occurred. A medical certificate attesting to the changed health 
condition shall be attached to such requests. Such requests 
shall be judged by the selective service command, and appeals to 
the determinations in the first instance shall be judged by the 
health care fitness evaluation institute of the Honved Forces. 
The submission of a petition for the judicial review of an 
affirmed determination in the second instance shall not have a 
delaying effect on the duty to perform military service, but the 
petition may include a request for the deferment of induction. 
In other respects, the general rules of state administrative 
procedure shall apply to the proceedings. 
  Other cases of the duty to appear 
  85.1. Persons of military age shall subject 
themselves to the medical (specialized medical) examination 
related to fitness for military service, and shall appear for 
this purpose at the medical institution designated by the 
selective service command, the draft board or the municipal 
clerk at the stated time. 
  85.2. Surgery on a person of military age, as part 
of medical therapy, shall be performed only with the consent of 
such person. Surgery, or examination procedures that qualify as 
surgery shall be governed by the provisions of the law 
concerning therapeutic and preventive services provided to 
citizens. 
  86. Persons of military age shall appear in 
response to a call by the selective service command to receive 
or to return military documents and personal equipment. A person 
subject to military service shall not refuse the receipt, 
preservation, or the return of documents and objects. 
  Induction 
  87.1. In response to a call-up or induction order 
issued by the selective service command, a person of military 
age called upon to report shall report with his military 
documents and equipment for duty at the place and time shown on 
the order. 
  87.2. A person of military age called upon to 
report for military duty and capable of walking shall obey the 
call-up command even if his induction to military service is 
temporarily prevented by a deficiency or illness. 
  87.3. A person of military age called upon to 
report for military duty and incapable of walking shall 
immediately report his impediment in writing to the selective 
service command. 
  87.4. A certificate by the attending physician or 
the institution providing medical treatment to the person called 
upon to perform military service shall be attached to the report 
filed pursuant to Paragraph 87.4. The certificate shall indicate 
the anticipated date of recovery. 
  87.5. At the time of induction, the person 
inducted to perform military service shall turn in his personal 
identification document and passport to the representative of 
the selective service command. During military service, the 
personal identification document and the passport shall be 
safeguarded by the commander of personnel having jurisdiction. 
These personal documents received shall be returned to their 
owners when discharged from military service. 
  Other provisions related to the duty to inform, report, 
and appear 
  88.1. The provisions of this Law shall be applied 
to the duty of persons of military age staying abroad to inform, 
to report, and to appear. 
  88.2. A person of military age staying abroad 
shall return to Hungary in response to a call issued by the 
selective service command, and shall appear at the place and 
time designated in the order. A person of military age staying 
abroad and failing to obey this command in order to evade the 
performance of military service shall be criminally liable for 
his act. 
  88.3. Persons of military age who have been 
informed of the anticipated date of enlisted military service, 
or to whom induction orders have been delivered, and further, 
persons who are performing military service may travel abroad 
only with the permission of the minister of defense. 
  88.4. Permission to travel abroad shall not be 
denied if the foreign stay of the person of military age already 
notified of the expected date of induction, or already in 
receipt of a call-up command, does not conflict with the 
commencement of his enlisted service within time limitations 
provided in Paragraph 100.4. below. 
  89. A person volunteering to perform enlisted 
military service shall have the duty to inform, to report, and 
to appear pursuant to this Law, beginning on the date when his 
volunteer enlistment is accepted, until he is called to perform 
military service. 
  90. A mayor designated by the regional prefect of 
the republic shall provide appropriately furnished premises for 
the administration of the draft, the reconciliation and 
verification of military records, and for induction, and shall 
provide the auxiliary personnel to be involved in the draft, 
composed of public officials employed at the mayor's office. 
  91. Any person who by his own fault fails to 
comply with the duty to appear related to military service and 
as specified in this Law shall be presented by the police, as 
provided for in a determination issued by the commander of the 
selective service command. 
  The duty to serve 
  92.1. As part of the duty to serve, persons of 
military age shall perform armed or unarmed military, or 
civilian service. 
  92.2. Unarmed military service and civilian 
service requested on grounds of conscientious objection, may be 
performed on the basis of permission. 
  The duty to perform military service 
  93.1. Based on the duty to perform military 
service, persons of military age shall perform enlisted, 
reserve, or auxiliary reserve military services. 
  93.2. Enlisted, reserve, and auxiliary reserve 
services shall be performed within the armed forces. 
  93.3. Unarmed military service shall be performed 
at a military organization designated for this purpose, or in 
the framework of a specific assignment. 
  94. In times of peace, a person of military age 
performing military duty shall be assigned for military duty 
abroad only on the basis of volunteering for such service. 
  Enlisted military service 
  95. The purpose of armed or unarmed enlisted 
military service is to provide theoretical and practical 
training to the person of military age, and to prepare such 
person for military tasks related to the defense of the 
homeland, and within that, to perform specific functions of a 
commander. 
  96.1. Except as provided for in Paragraphs 96.2., 
96.3., and 97.2., the duration of armed and unarmed enlisted 
military service shall be 12 months. 
  96.2. The duration of the enlisted military 
service for persons of military age supporting two natural, 
adopted, step-, or cared for children residing in the same 
household shall be six months. For purposes of this provision, a 
cared for child is one who has been supported by the person of 
military age within his own household for at least one year 
prior to his induction. 
  96.3. If a student enrolled in a military or 
police educational institution providing 12 months of training, 
discontinues his studies within 12 months by no fault of his 
own, the time spent as a student shall be credited as enlisted 
military service. This provision shall not apply to students of 
military intermediate schools. 
  96.4. In exceptional, deserving cases, the 
remaining period of enlisted military service may be reduced or 
waived by the chief of staff of the Honved Forces, if so 
recommended by the commander of the educational institution 
referred to in Paragraph 96.3. 
  96.5. Enrollment as a student in a military or 
police educational institution for at least 12 months shall 
fully satisfy the requirement of performing enlisted military 
service. 
  97.1. Persons of military age enrolled in 
institutions of higher education may, at their option, perform 
enlisted military service before commencing, or after completing 
their studies. 
  97.2. A person of military age having completed 
(completing) his studies at an institution of higher education, 
who voluntarily applies and is accepted for training as a 
reserve officer or reserve noncommissioned officer, shall 
perform nine months of enlisted military service after 
completion of his studies at the institution of higher 
education. After basic training and theoretical studies, such 
persons shall perform part of their service as practitioners 
assigned to troops [obscure sentence]. 
  98. A person of military age, submitting a request 
prior to the date of being drafted at the latest, to be called 
up prior to reaching the age of 21, shall have the right to 
choose the date of induction, and, if military interests permit, 
his duty station (place of service). Such requests shall be 
submitted to the selective service command. 
  99.1. Time served in a military detention room, 
and further, the time during which the convicted soldier evaded 
serving his sentence or illegally evaded the performance of 
enlisted military service shall not be credited to the period of 
enlisted military service. 
  99.2. A period of confinement based on 
disciplinary action shall not be credited to enlisted military 
service if the combined duration of confinement based on 
disciplinary action in force at the time of discharge exceeds 30 
days. 
  99.3. If an enlisted man manifests exemplary 
conduct during his imprisonment or confinement based on 
disciplinary action, as well as in the course of his subsequent 
service, the period of confinement or the period of imprisonment 
may be credited in whole or in part as enlisted service. Such 
credit shall be given by the commander in charge of personnel 
regarding confinement, and by the chief of staff of the Honved 
Forces upon recommendation by the commander in charge of 
personnel, or the national commander of the Border Guard, as the 
case may be, regarding imprisonment, provided that the term of 
enlisted military service, including the period of confinement 
and imprisonment, has expired. 
  99.4. A soldier may file a complaint with the 
superior commander in the chain of command against the 
commander's decision denying credit for the duration of 
confinement. 
  Induction for enlisted military service 
  100.1. In planning and implementing induction, 
selective service commands shall endeavor to assign draftees to 
military posts close to where they live, in due regard to the 
provisions of Paragraph 98. above. 
  100.2. The Minister of Defense shall establish the 
time schedule for inducting draftees for enlisted service. 
  100.3. Draftees shall be inducted for enlisted 
service only after their 18th birthday. Volunteers, however, may 
be inducted at a younger age, after their 17th birthday, based 
on parental consent, and on the opinion of a medical specialist 
provided for by law, finding the volunteer to be fit to perform 
military service. 
  100.4. Unless a draftee has submitted a request 
pursuant to Paragraph 98. above, and except as provided for in 
Paragraphs 100.5 and 100.6 below, he may be drafted for enlisted 
military service until the 31st day of the year in which he 
completes his 25th year (compulsory enlistment age). 
  100.5. A draftee may be inducted for enlisted 
military service (or the continuation of enlisted military 
service) for two years after the time limit pursuant to 
Paragraph 100.4. has expired, if the impediments enumerated 
below have ceased, but in no event later than the 31st day of 
December in the year in which the draftee completes his 30th 
year of age, if 
  A. the draftee's enlisted military service has been 
interrupted; 
  B. the draftee received a deferment of military service 
performance, except if deferment was based on Paragraph 107.1.b. 
below; 
  C. the draftee has submitted a request for unarmed military 
duty or civilian service and the request has been denied; or if 
  D. the deferment of induction or discharge has been ordered 
based on a petition for the judicial review of a determination 
relative to the deferment or interruption of enlisted military 
service or to exemption from induction, if the court has issued 
an affirmed judgment refusing to review the petition; or if 
  E. the draftee could not perform enlisted military service 
because 
  a. criminal proceedings were pending against him, or 
because he was under preliminary arrest; 
  b. he was serving a prison sentence; and further, because 
  c. by profession he is a practicing priest or minister; 
  d. by profession he is an artist; or 
  e. could not be inducted due to his nomination for, or 
election as a national assembly or local government 
representative. 
  100.6. In cases defined in Paragraphs 100.5.C. and 
100.5.D, if the authority (court) proceeding in the case has not 
rendered an affirmed judgment as of the deadline provided in 
Paragraph 100.5., the draftee may be inducted after that 
deadline for the performance or continuation of enlisted 
military service, but in no event later than within six months 
from the date of a final decision completing the case. 
  101. The selective service command shall deliver 
the induction command to persons to be inducted at least 15 days 
prior to the date of induction. 
  102.1. Any person who could not be inducted for 
enlisted military service within the time limits established in 
Paragraphs 100.4. and 100.5 because he had failed to perform one 
or another legally required duty, may be inducted after the 
prescribed deadline, but in no event after his 40th birthday. 
  102.2. The selective service command shall render 
a decision in the form of a determination regarding the 
feasibility of inducting a person pursuant to Paragraph 102.1. 
Related proceedings may be initiated within one year from the 
date the authority had learned about the person's failure to 
perform his duty. The determination of the selective service 
command may be appealed to the chief of staff of the Honved 
Forces. General rules of state administrative procedure shall 
apply to these proceedings. 
  102.3. Draftees may be inducted for enlisted 
military service prior to the deadline specified in Paragraph 
102.1., or, in case of a determination pursuant to Paragraph 
102.2, or of the initiation of judicial review, within two years 
from the date of the affirmed judgment of the court. 
  103.1. A person of military age or draftee shall 
not be inducted to perform enlisted military service if 
  a. he was found to be unfit to perform military service; 
  b. his obligation to serve was deferred, or if his service 
was interrupted, for the period of the deferment or until the 
expiration of the shortest period of interruption; 
  c. he submitted a petition to perform unarmed military or 
civilian service, until an affirmed decision is rendered 
regarding the request; d. he has completed enlisted military 
service in the army of a foreign state, as required in that 
state; 
  e. criminal proceedings for a criminal act sanctioned by 
imprisonment of five years or more are pending against him, or 
if he is under preliminary arrest, or if he is serving his 
prison sentence; 
  f. he has been sentenced to serve a prison term of any 
length for a crime against the state, or a three year prison 
term for any crime, or a combined total of five years based on 
several sentences, or if his release from under the adverse 
consequences of criminal background is pending; 
  g. he is a priest or minister practicing his profession; 
  h. he supports three or more children, as defined in 
Paragraph 96.2., in his own household; 
  i. he has acquired a diploma in the arts from the Ferenc 
Liszt Musical Arts Academy, or the Hungarian Ballet Academy, or 
from the Artist Training Institute and is practicing his 
profession as an artist; and further, if 
  j. his fitness for military service has been determined 
more than a year ago; 
  k. he has been registered as a candidate for National 
Assembly or local government representative, or if he has been 
elected to such posts, as long as he remains a candidate or 
until his mandate expires; 
  l. his brother (stepbrother) has committed suicide at his 
service post while performing military service, or if he has 
lost his life at his service post as a result of a criminal act, 
or if he died while performing his duty or in a related 
accident; or if 
  m. at his request, he has been temporarily exempted from 
induction by the minister of defense at the recommendation of a 
minister having jurisdiction, or on grounds of a personal 
interest of exceptional merit. 
  103.2. If a person of military age or a draftee 
receives a a notice concerning the expected date of induction, 
or an induction order despite the exclusionary causes listed in 
Paragraph 103.1 above, he may request to be exempted from 
induction. Such request shall be made to the chief of staff of 
the Honved Forces. 
  103.3. The filing of a request for exemption shall 
have no delaying effect with respect to the induction. The time 
allowed for judging such requests shall be 15 days. The decision 
of the chief of staff shall not be subject to appeal. The 
inducted person may request the deferment of induction or his 
discharge in a petition seeking judicial review of the 
determination issued by the chief of staff. The general rules of 
state administrative procedure shall govern such proceedings. 
  Deferment of enlisted military service 
  104.1. Performance of enlisted military service by 
a draftee may be deferred on grounds of an illness or deficiency 
prevailing at the time of his induction, an obligation to 
sustain his family, an intent to continue studies, an important 
public interest, or valid personal interest. 
  104.2. A request for the deferment of enlisted 
military service may be submitted prior to receipt of an 
induction order, except if the cause for requesting the 
deferment arose after receipt of the induction order. 
  104.3. The submission of a request (proposal) for 
the deferment of enlisted military service shall not exempt a 
person from obeying the induction order. 
  Deferment for health reasons 
  105.1. The induction of a draftee shall be 
temporarily deferred (temporary unfitness) until his recovery if 
he suffers from an illness that temporarily prevents him from 
performing service, or, in the case of a passing deficiency, 
until the deficiency ceases. 
  105.2. Deferment of enlisted military service for 
health reasons shall be authorized by the draft board, and if 
the illness occurs after drafting, by the commander of the 
selective service command. The person authorizing the deferment 
may require that the draftee appear at a medical control 
examination and once again before the draft board. 
  105.3. A physicians certificate shall be attached 
to petitions requesting the deferment of enlisted military 
service for health reasons. 
  Deferment of service on grounds of family 
support 
  106.1. A draftee's induction for enlisted military 
service shall be deferred for reasons of having to support his 
family, if he is the sole provider for a direct ascendant struck 
by illness or in need of care, a brother or sister of minor age, 
a spouse, or a child, any of which reside in the same household 
as the draftee, provided that those in need have no other 
relative capable of providing support, or if the nursing and 
other care cannot be provided by another relative, if the social 
welfare institution does not provide sustenance, and if the 
draftee's induction threatens the livelihood of the relative 
supported. 
  106.2. The draftee, or relative in need of support 
and care may submit a petition for deferment of service on 
grounds of family support. A head of household certification 
prepared by the municipal clerk shall be attached to the 
petition, together with the attending physician's certification 
regarding the health condition of the relative in need of care 
and support. 
  106.3. Deferment of service may be authorized for 
at least six months, or for a maximum of two years, and may be 
extended upon request, if the conditions continue to prevail. 
  Deferment of service for educational purposes 
  107.1. A draftee shall be granted permission to 
defer performance of his military service if he pursues 
  a. basic education at an institution of higher education 
  b. daytime studies at an intermediate school, or receives 
skilled worker training, provided that the educational 
institution verifies that the studies are being pursued or that 
they will be pursued within a year. 
  107.2. Permission to defer the performance of 
military service may be granted to a draftee if he pursues 
specialized higher education, doctoral studies, or any 
specialized studies needed to perform work, provided that 
induction for enlisted military service would present 
disproportionate difficulties or disadvantages. The minister of 
defense, in concurrence with the minister of culture and public 
education, may mandate by decree that permission to defer the 
performance of military service be granted in cases described in 
this Section. 
  107.3. Deferment of military service shall be 
permitted until the expected completion date of studies, and the 
deferment shall be extended if necessary, upon request, in due 
regard to the provisions of Paragraph 108. Permission to defer 
the performance of military service shall not be granted for 
studies specified in Paragraphs 107.1.a. or 107.2. after 30 June 
of the year in which the draftee becomes 30 years of age, or in 
Paragraph 107.1.b. after 31 December of the year in which the 
draftee becomes 25 years of age. Permission to defer service 
performance sought for the commencement of studies may be 
granted for a 30 day period following the anticipated date of 
commencing studies. 
  107.4. The benefit of deferment of military 
service shall be withdrawn if the conditions specified in 
Paragraphs 107.1. and 107.2. no longer prevail. 
  108.1. Except for studies continuously pursued for 
a higher degree of high level education, a draftee shall be 
entitled to the deferment of military service only for the time 
period needed to acquire a single high level degree chosen by 
the draftee. 
  108.2. If the draftee is unable to complete his 
studies specified in Paragraph 108.1. during the prescribed 
period of time, his duty to perform military service shall be 
extended at his request not more than twice, and in each case 
for a maximum of one year only. In his request for deferment the 
draftee shall indicate the reason for the requested deferment, 
and shall state that he intends to complete his high level 
studies. 
  108.3. The educational institution and the 
employer shall provide an opportunity for the selective service 
command to verify the performance of tasks which serve as the 
basis for deferment, and to compare records. 
  Deferment of service in the public interest 
  109.1. The induction of draftees for enlisted 
military service may be deferred based on an important public 
interest provided that the draftee performs outstanding 
activities for the state or society, in the economy, sciences, 
arts, or sports during the period for which deferment is sought. 
  109.2. Deferment may be granted for the shortest 
possible period of time corresponding with the cause that gave 
rise for deferment, for a maximum of two years. 
  109.3. Deferment shall be authorized by the 
minister of defense, based on the recommendation of the minister 
having jurisdiction over the field of activity that gives rise 
for deferment, or of the regional prefect of the Republic having 
jurisdiction at the place of the draftee's residence. A document 
attesting to the public interest character of the cause of 
deferment shall be attached to the request for deferment. 
  Deferment of service for personal interest 
  110.1. Deferment of service for a minimum of six 
months and a maximum of two years may be granted in 
exceptionally deserving cases of personal interest, based on the 
evaluation of proof supporting the circumstances presented. 
Deferment may be extended beyond the two year period upon 
request, if the conditions described continue to prevail. 
  110.2. Proof supportive of the request shall be 
attached to the petition for deferment. 
  Procedures related to deferment of service 
  111.1. Except in cases of deferment in the public 
interest, and deferment to be granted in the course of drafting 
for health reasons, the commander of the selective service 
command shall be authorized to grant permissions for deferment 
of service. The determinations of the commander of the selective 
service command may be appealed to the chief of staff of the 
Honved Forces. 
  111.2. Generally, appeals based on the denial of 
request to defer enlisted military service shall have no 
delaying effect with respect to induction and the performance of 
service. Nevertheless, if warranted, induction may be deferred 
pending the evaluation of the related case. Draftees may request 
the deferment of induction or their discharge in the petition 
for the judicial review of determinations affirmed in the second 
instance. 
  111.3. The general rules of state administrative 
procedure shall be applied relative to issues related to the 
deferment of service not dealt with here. 
  Interruption of enlisted military service 
  112.1. A draftee's enlisted military service shall 
be interrupted if 
  a. a passing health deficiency is diagnosed during his 
enlisted military service, until the deficiency ceases; 
  b. an obligation as head of household (Paragraph 106.1.) 
arises, or becomes known after his induction, as long as such 
obligation exists; 
  c. he was admitted for the pursuit of a daytime curriculum 
in an institution of higher education, until the completion of 
studies; 
  d. he was sentenced to serve more than a year in prison 
based on an affirmed judgment of a court, until his release; 
  e. he was registered as a candidate for National Assembly 
or local government representative until the elections, or, if 
elected, until 30 days after his mandate expires. 
  112.2. Enlisted military service shall be 
interrupted in cases specified in Paragraphs 112.1.a. through 
112.1.c. when the cause is determined; in cases specified in 
Paragraph 112.1.d. on the first day of serving the prison 
sentence; and in cases specified in Paragraph 112.1.e. within 
eight days from the date of receipt of notice. 
  112.3. Enlisted military service shall be 
interrupted on an ex officio basis for reasons specified in 
Paragraphs 112.1.a. and 112.1.d.; on the basis of notice on 
grounds specified in Paragraph 112.1.e.; and on grounds 
specified in Paragraph 112.1.a. also on the basis of request. In 
all other instances the interruption shall take place in 
response to request. 
  112.4. A document attesting to the reasons for 
interruption shall be attached to the document containing a 
request for, or notice of interruption. 
  112.5. Interruption of enlisted military service 
based on the obligation to support the draftee's family may be 
requested by the enlisted man or the relative in need of support 
from the commander of the military organization in which the 
enlisted man serves. 
  112.6. Such requests shall be judged by the chief 
of staff of the Honved Forces, or, in cases involving the Border 
Guard, by the national commander of the Border Guard, upon 
recommendation by the commander in charge of personnel, in due 
regard to opinions expressed by the commander of the selective 
service command. The chief of staff of the Honved Forces shall 
issue a determination in response to such requests, and such 
determinations shall not be subject to appeal. General rules of 
state administrative procedure shall apply to procedural issues 
not dealt with here. 
  Common rules for deferment and interruption of 
enlisted military service 
  113.1. If the cause of deferment or interruption 
of enlisted service ceases, the petitioner has a duty to report 
this fact in person or in writing within eight days to the 
selective service command having jurisdiction in the area. 
  113.2. Selective service commands shall terminate 
the deferment or interruption of service, if they learn that the 
cause for deferment or interruption no longer prevails, or in 
cases involving a benefit provided on grounds of having to 
support a family, if the draftee, by his own fault, fails to 
perform the obligation to support the family. 
  Discharge from enlisted military service 
  114.1. A draftee performing enlisted military 
service shall be discharged after completing his term of 
enlisted military service. 
  114.1. A draftee shall be discharged at a date 
other than the date specified in the rotation order, if 
  a. a second child is born during his enlisted military 
service, and he has already served for six months; 
  b. his term of service expires, based on credit for time 
spent in training at a military or police educational 
institution for up to 12 months; 
  c. his term of service expires, disregarding time spent in 
military confinement or detention; 
  d. ordered to be placed under preliminary arrest, based on 
the recommendation of the proceeding organ; 
  e. a third child is born, irrespective of the length of 
service and without delay; 
  f. determined to be permanently unfit, within eight days of 
such determination; 
  g. his request for deferment of enlisted military service 
is favorably judged; h. a court orders that the draftee be 
discharged; and if 
  i. he submits a request for permission to perform unarmed 
military, or civilian service during the time period starting 
with his induction and ending with his taking the military oath. 
  114.3. The provisions of Paragraph 114.1. may be 
disregarded in situations presented at the time of rotation, if 
the draftee is indispensable from the military standpoint based 
on his professional training and peculiar military assignment, 
and if the draftee is retained for this reason for reserve duty 
not exceeding 30 days. An order to retain shall be issued by the 
minister of defense, as recommended by the commander of the 
Honved Forces. The draftee shall receive a written notice of 
retention three months prior to his actual retention. The period 
of retention shall be credited to the total length of reserve 
military duty. 
  Permitting the performance of unarmed military 
service and civilian service 
  115.1. Except as provided for in Paragraph 115.3., 
requests for permission to perform unarmed military service or 
civilian service may be submitted by persons of military age 
prior to their performance of service, after the establishment 
of their military records, until they take the military oath, at 
the latest. 
  115.2. Such requests shall be presented to the 
commander of the selective service command or to the municipal 
clerk, or, after induction, to the commander in charge of 
personnel. Requests shall be accompanied by a standard form 
designed to elicit certain data required by law. 
  115.3. Reservists and auxiliary reservists of 
military age may request permission for the performance of 
unarmed military, or civilian service prior to the receipt of 
induction orders. 
  115.4. Draftees shall not be inducted before a 
final disposition of their case is made. A draftee shall be 
discharged if the request was submitted after induction, but 
prior to taking the military oath. 
  115.4. The submission of a request shall not 
exempt the draftee from the duty to appear and report. 
  116.1. Requests for unarmed military or civilian 
service shall be judged by the municipal clerk. The selective 
service command may participate in the proceedings as an 
interested party. 
  116.2. A request for unarmed military or civilian 
service shall be rejected if circumstances do not warrant 
grounds for claiming conscientious objection. Permission shall 
be granted if the proceeding organ is unable to prove the lack 
of grounds for conscientious objection. 
  116.3. The following shall be regarded as 
indicating a lack of grounds for conscientious objection: 
  a. the draftee's permit to possess firearms, or a request 
for such permit in the course of the preceding year; 
  b. the draftee's present possession of firearms, 
ammunition, or explosive materials, or possession of the same 
during the previous one year period; 
  c. the draftee's violent action against a person or thing, 
or other violent conduct, which provides substantial grounds to 
believe that military service is not in conflict with his 
convictions of conscience. 
  116.4. General rules of state administrative 
procedure shall be applied to permitting unarmed military or 
civilian service. 
  117. A draftee permitted to perform civilian 
service shall not be permitted to perform military service, even 
if he so requests. 
  118.1. The term for civilian service shall be 18 
months. 
  118.2. Time not served due to interruption of 
service, and time spent away from the duty station by the 
draftee's own fault shall not be credited to civilian service. 
  118.3. Time served in the military shall be 
credited to civilian service. 
  119.1. Civilian service shall be performed at a 
designated civilian workplace. 
  119.2. A draftee having completed his civilian 
service for the time period specified by law shall be regarded 
as having completed his military service. 
  120. Separate law shall govern the performance of 
civilian service, the rights and duties, disciplinary and 
financial responsibility of draftees performing civilian 
service, the place where service is performed, as well as the 
deferment and interruption of civilian service. 
  Reserve military service 
  121. The purpose of reserve military service shall 
be the retraining or continued training of persons having 
performed enlisted military or auxiliary reserve military 
service, and of persons whose status has been changed from 
professional and reenlisted to reserve, the training of persons 
beyond the enlistment age who have not performed enlisted 
military service, and further, the performance of certain 
military tasks. 
  122.1. Persons subject to the performance of 
military service, as defined in Paragraph 47. above, shall be 
categorized within three age groups: 
  a. Age group I, until the age of 35; 
  b. Age group II, until the age of 45; 
  c. Age group III, beyond the age of 45. 
  122.2. Persons subject to the performance of 
military service who did not perform enlisted military service 
at the enlistment age and did not receive permission to perform 
civilian service belong to the auxiliary reserve. 
  122.3. Priests and ministers practicing their 
profession shall be part of the auxiliary reserve even during 
their enlistment age. 
  123.1. A person subject to the performance of 
reserve military service may be called up for purposes of 
  a. retraining; 
  b. continued training; 
  c. unexpected mobilization exercise; 
  d. performance of special military service. 
  123.2. A person subject to the performance of 
reserve military service may be called up for purposes of 
retraining and continued training only if three years has passed 
since his discharge from enlisted military service. 
  123.3. A person subject to the performance of 
auxiliary reserve military service may be called up for four 
months of training prior to the age of 40. After completing such 
training the auxiliary reservists shall be placed in the 
reserves. 
  123.4. Except in case of unexpected mobilization 
exercises pursuant to Paragraph 36.3., persons subject to the 
performance of reserve of auxiliary reserve military service 
shall be notified at least six months in advance of the date of 
the proposed call up. 
  124.1. Age group I reservists may be called up for 
continued training or retraining once every three or four years, 
in each case for a period not exceeding 30 days, with the 
combined total number of days served not exceeding 80 days. 
  124.2. Age group II reservists may be called up 
for continued training in each case for a period of time not 
exceeding 20 days, or a combined total of 40 days. 
  124.3. Age group III reservists shall not be 
called up for the performance of military service in times of 
peace. 
  124.4. In times of peace, the combined, total 
duration of reserve and auxiliary reserve service shall not 
exceed 4 - 4 months [as published]. 
  124.5. For the performance of tasks specified in 
Paragraph 22.2.h. (to ward off catastrophes) reservists may be 
called up to perform reserve military duty for a period not 
exceeding two months, beyond the period specified in Paragraph 
124.4. 
  124.6. In addition to the time of service 
authorized in Paragraphs 124.4. and 124.5., a reservist may 
volunteer during the entire period in which he is subject to the 
performance of military service, to perform special military 
service for a period not exceeding six months, and within the 
framework of the task specified in Paragraph 22.1.e. above. 
  Reserve commander training 
  125.1. Reservists having a high level of education 
may volunteer for reserve officer training; reservists with an 
intermediate education may volunteer for noncommissioned officer 
training. 
  125.2. The training of reserve officers and 
noncommissioned officers shall take place after completion of 
enlisted military service, and in courses provided in the 
framework of reserve continued education. 
  Exemption from under reserve military service 
  126.1. The following shall be exempt from 
performing reserve military service: 
  a. professional and civilian employees of the national 
security service, and the professional members of the rest of 
the law and order organs; 
  b. persons having received permission to perform civilian 
service, or having completed civilian service. 
  126.2. The exemption from under reserve military 
service may also be extended by the minister of defense to apply 
to other persons subject to military service. 
  127.1. A temporary exemption from being called up 
for reserve military service may be granted if the conditions 
for deferred service pursuant to Paragraph 104.1. prevail, 
except with respect to deferment for educational purposes. 
  127.2. Based on individual merit, an exemption may 
be granted to persons subject to military service, if 
  a. as a skilled employee, his work function is 
indispensable, and replacement cannot be found for the duration 
of reserve military service, provided that the employer verifies 
this fact; 
  b. he maintains a business enterprise in which the work 
performed by him, personally, is indispensable, provided that 
restarting the enterprise after the performance of reserve 
military duty would present disproportionate difficulties; 
  c. he participates in formal or informal training needed to 
the acquisition of specialized knowledge needed for the 
performance of work, provided that the organ conducting the 
training verifies that completion of the training on the 
scheduled date would be impossible as a result of the time spent 
in the performance of reserve military service. 
  128.1. Rules specified in Paragraphs 111. and 113. 
above shall also apply with respect to temporary exemptions from 
under reserve military service. 
  128.2. Except for cases specified in Paragraph 
127.2., temporary exemption may be requested for the entire time 
period in which a person may be called up to perform reserve 
military service. Exemptions may be granted for periods of time 
specified in rules applicable to the deferment of service. 
  128.3. A person receiving notice of the expected 
date of being called up for reserve military service may request 
that his call up be deferred. Such requests shall be made in one 
instance only. 
  128.4. Based on grounds specified in Paragraph 
127.2., an exemption may be granted only to the person subject 
to military service having received a notice of the expected 
date of a call up. Exemption represents only a onetime deferment 
of the call up, but in justified cases deferment may be granted 
for a specific period of time, but in no event for more than two 
years. 
  129.1. A reservist shall not be called up for the 
performance of military service 
  a. if he is exempted, or temporarily exempted from 
performing reserve military service; 
  b. if the circumstances described in Paragraphs 103.a., 
103.c., 103.e., 103.k., 103.l., and 103.m. prevail. 
  129.2. If a reservist receives notice of the 
expected date of call up for reserve military service despite 
the circumstances specified in Paragraph 129.1. above, or 
receives an order of induction, he may request the chief of 
staff of the Honved Forces to exempt him from the duty to report. 
  129.3. The procedural rules specified in Paragraph 
103.3 shall also apply to call up for reserve military service. 
  Military service in case of mobilization 
  130.1. Except for persons permitted to perform 
civilian military service, and persons subject to military 
service specified in Paragraphs 103.a., 103.f., and 103.h., as 
well as in 103.2., any persons subject to perform military 
service may be called up in case of mobilization, and may be 
retained for military service as necessary. 
  130.2. In case of extraordinary conditions, the 
call up of persons subject to military service may be 
temporarily waived on grounds of an important public interest 
linked to the work function performed or assigned to such 
persons. 
  130.3. The rights and duties of persons subject to 
military service defined in Paragraph 130.2. shall be determined 
by detailed rules and measures to be applied under extraordinary 
conditions. 
  Dismissal from under military obligations 
  131. When a person reaches the upper limit of the 
military age (Paragraph 70.1.), the person subject to military 
service shall receive a written notice from the selective 
service command, informing him that he is no longer subject to 
military service. 
  Civil defense obligation 
  132.1. Citizens shall be obligated to perform 
civil defense functions in times of peace as well as under 
extraordinary conditions. 
  132.2. Under extraordinary conditions it shall be 
the purpose of the civil defense obligation to prepare the 
populace for the prevention, mitigation, and reduction of the 
impact of damages caused by offensive weapons and other 
extraordinary events, and to perform the related rescue and 
relief functions. 
  132.3. For purposes described in Paragraph 132.2. 
above, men between the ages of 16 and 60, and women between the 
ages of 18 and 55 shall have civil defense obligations. 
  132.4. Detailed rules for civil defense 
obligations shall be established by separate law. 
  National defense work obligation 
  133.1. A duty to perform national defense work may 
be established under extraordinary or emergency conditions 
proclaimed pursuant to the Constitution. 
  133.2. Based on the duty to perform national 
defense work, citizens--men between the ages of 16 and 65, and 
women between the ages of 18 and 60--may be obligated to perform 
physical or mental work permanently or temporarily, consistent 
with their abilities and health conditions. 
  133.3. Those obligated to perform national defense 
work shall perform such work at a designated workplace. 
  134.1. The following shall be exempt from the 
performance of national defense work: 
  a. expectant mothers from the date when pregnancy is 
determined; 
  b. mothers until their child reaches the age of three; 
  c. sole persons caring or tending for blood relatives or 
spouses residing in the same household, requiring care or the 
services of a nurse; 
  d. single parents providing for a child under the age of 15 
within their own households; 
  e. persons disabled to an extent of at least 67 percent, or 
unfit to perform work due to their health conditions; 
  f. persons exempted by the minister exercising supervisory 
authority, in concurrence with the minister of labor affairs, 
from the performance of work obligation due to an important 
public interest; 
  g. priests or ministers practicing their profession. 
  134.2. The national defense work obligation shall 
not extend to active members of the armed forces and of law and 
order organs, or to the public officials and public employees of 
the armed forces and of law and order organs. 
<H6>  Chapter VII </H6>
  ENTITLEMENTS OF PERSONS PERFORMING THEIRPERSONAL 
NATIONAL DEFENSE OBLIGATIONSAND OF THEIR RELATIVES 
  The protection of the social welfare interests of 
persons performing their personal national defense 
obligations, and of their dependents 
  135.1. The state shall provide for the 
appreciation and the protection of the rights of persons 
performing national defense duty. 
  135.2. The rules of interest protection shall 
extend to those who 
  a. appear for duty; 
  b. perform enlisted, reserve, or auxiliary reserve military 
duty; 
  c. perform civilian duty; 
  d. perform civil defense duty. 
  135.3. In cases specified by this law, the 
interests of the families of persons enumerated in Paragraph 
135.2. performing their duty shall also be protected pursuant to 
this law. 
  Leave 
  136. Except in cases of immediate induction or 
call up, employed persons of military age shall, upon their 
request, be granted two workdays of unpaid (not compensated) 
leave prior to their reporting for enlisted military service, or 
for reserve or auxiliary reserve duty exceeding 20 days. 
  The protection of handicapped workers 
  137. Rules pertaining to handicapped workers shall 
be applied to the job placement, employment, and benefits of 
persons receiving accident related benefits or pension stemming 
from an illness or accident suffered while performing national 
defense duty. 
  Use of residence 
  138. The residence of a person of military age 
shall not be regarded as abandoned during his military service, 
and his lease shall not be terminated on these grounds. 
  Land allotment and other benefits 
  139. Persons of military age shall be entitled to 
the same benefits regarding land use as those for which he has 
acquired a right prior to his induction or call up, and to the 
same benefits to which he is entitled based on his membership in 
a cooperative. 
  Social welfare benefits 
  140.1. Municipal clerks shall assess the social 
welfare and other support needs of draftees' dependents, and, in 
case of induction, shall make arrangements for the provision of 
payments and support pursuant to law. 
  140.2. If a soldier's wife sharing a common 
household with the soldier is employed, the placement of the 
child in a state (local government) nursing home, nursery, or 
day care facility nearest to the residence or workplace shall be 
arranged, in due regard to limitations and exclusionary criteria 
provided by law. 
  140.3. In the even that the child of a person of 
military age doing his military service is in need of care, he 
may be temporarily placed in a resident child care institution 
(newborn care facility, boarding school) if his relatives are 
unable to care for him (e.g., for reasons of illness). 
  Compensation for work hours lost for complying with 
the requirement to appear 
  141. A person of military age not employed shall 
be entitled to compensation for the time at work he would have 
lost had he been employed, while discharging his duty to appear. 
The municipal clerk shall make such payment, based on the 
minimum monthly wage of a full time employee. 
  Reimbursement of travel expenses 
  142.1. The selective service command shall 
reimburse the travel expenses of persons discharging their duty 
to appear (report) relative to military obligations. 
  142.2. Soldiers travelling on leave within Hungary 
or abroad, as specified in Paragraph 135.2.b. shall be entitled 
to cut rate fares on public transportation vehicles, as provided 
for by law. 
  Aid to report for duty 
  143.1. A person inducted for enlisted military 
service shall be entitled to a onetime induction aid payment to 
be disbursed by the municipal clerk prior to induction. 
  143.2. The amount of the induction aid shall be 60 
percent of the legally mandated monthly minimum wage of a full 
time employee, and 100 percent of that amount if the person of 
military age has a dependent child. 
  143.3. From the standpoint of entitlement to 
induction aid, a person of military age shall be regarded as a 
provider if he supports a natural, adopted, or foster child, or 
a child whom he raises at the time of receipt of the induction 
command. 
  144.1. An inducted person shall not be obligated 
to repay the induction aid if the induction does not result in 
enlisted military service, but he shall not be entitled to 
induction aid in case of his subsequent induction. 
  144.2. Except for advance payment of personal 
income tax and child support payments, no indebtedness shall be 
deducted from the induction aid payment. 
  Family support payments 
  145.1. An enlisted man's dependent unable to work 
and in need of support shall receive family aid payments, if 
prior to induction the enlisted man supported such dependent 
from his own earnings or income, or if the need to support such 
dependent arose after the induction of the enlisted man, or if 
the enlisted man's support obligation was established by a court. 
  145.2. From the standpoint of entitlement to 
receive family aid, the following shall be regarded as 
dependents: the inducted person's wife; natural, adopted, or 
foster child, or child raised by him; natural, adoptive, or 
foster parents, or parents who brought up the inducted person; 
his grandparents; his minor brothers and sisters, or brothers 
and sisters unable to work; and further, his partner in life, if 
a child was born from such partnership. 
  145.3. The parent of the enlisted man's wife shall 
also be regarded as a dependent if the inducted soldier 
supported such parent in his household prior to the commencement 
of military service, and further, the divorced wife of the 
enlisted man, if he is under court order to pay alimony. 
  145.4. Dependents of the enlisted man not of 
Hungarian citizenship shall also be entitled to receive family 
aid payments, if the authorities of the country of such 
dependent do not provide social welfare payments, and if other 
conditions of entitlement for family aid prevail. 
  145.5. The residency of a dependent not of 
Hungarian citizenship shall be determined on the basis of having 
a permit to stay or settle in Hungary. 
  145.6. From the standpoint of entitlement to 
receive family aid payments, a partner in life referred to in 
Paragraph 145.2. shall be regarded as a dependent even before a 
child fathered by the enlisted man is born, if the enlisted man 
issues a statement unconditionally recognizing that he fathered 
the fetus. 
  145.7. A wife and a partner in life shall be 
entitled to simultaneously receive family aid payments if the 
wife living separately (former wife) is entitled to receive 
court ordered alimony payments. 
  146.1. From the standpoint of entitlement to 
receive family aid payments, a person shall be regarded as 
unable to work if he or she is 
  a. a dependent with at least a 67 percent disability; 
  b. the wife or partner in life of the inducted person, 
provided that such person supports at least one child; if she is 
pregnant or pregnant in a critical condition; or if she is a 
student enrolled in a daytime curriculum at an institution of 
higher education, or is an apprentice skilled worker; 
  c. a dependent eligible to receive old age pension; 
  d. a brother, sister or child until the age of 16, or 
enrolled in a daytime curriculum at an intermediate school, or 
conducting private studies due to an illness or physical 
handicap, or enrolled in a therapeutic educational institution, 
until the conclusion of his or her studies, but in no event 
after reaching the age of 20. 
  146.2. From the standpoint of entitlement to 
receive family aid payments, a brother, sister, or child shall 
also be regarded as unable to work, if such person has become 
unable to work in the long term when reaching the age of 16, or 
if such person has become at least 67 percent disabled, if this 
condition has prevailed for at least one year, or is expected to 
last for at least one year, beginning at the outset of the 
disability. 
  146.3. If an enlisted man's wife resides in 
Hungary but does not have Hungarian citizenship, or if she 
acquired Hungarian citizenship by virtue of marriage, she shall 
be regarded as unable to work if the knowledge of the Hungarian 
language is indispensable for performing work commensurate with 
her skilled or professional qualifications, and she is unable to 
find employment commensurate with her skilled or professional 
qualifications because she does not know Hungarian. 
  146.4. No entitlement to family aid payments shall 
be established for dependents placed in social welfare homes, 
boarding schools, newborn care facilities, child health care 
homes, or skilled worker apprentice homes. Fees for caring for 
such persons shall be disbursed by municipal clerks. 
  147.1. From the standpoint of eligibility to 
receive family aid payments, a dependent unable to work and 
residing in the enlisted man's household or in a separate 
household, as well as employed dependents whose earnings, or 
total income received in any form does not exceed the threshold 
amount for eligibility for family aid payments pursuant to 
Paragraph 148. below, shall be regarded as persons in need of 
support. 
  147.2. In case of several dependents, the 
earnings, or income in any form of all dependents residing in 
the same household shall be added up, and the dependents shall 
be regarded as persons in need of support, if their combined 
total monthly earnings (income) do not exceed the threshold 
limits established in Paragraph 148. below. 
  147.3. If dependents in need of family aid reside 
within separate households, their earnings (income) shall be 
calculated on a per household basis. 
  147.4. Persons receiving non reimbursable support 
from the state shall not be regarded as dependents in need of 
support. 
  148. The amount to serve as the basis for 
determining the need for family aid payments shall be the 
equivalent of the prevailing minimum pension payment a person 
receives on his own right. For each additional person, the 
amount shall be increased by 70 percent of the amount allotted 
to the initial person. 
  149.1. In examining whether a dependent is in need 
of support, the average regular earnings and income from any 
source over the three-month period immediately preceding the 
application shall be considered. In calculating annual earnings 
or income, the average monthly earnings or income shall be 
calculated on the basis of 1/12th of one year's income. 
  149.2. The following, in particular, shall be 
included in earning or income received form any source: 
  a. from the standpoint of employed persons, all moneys and 
in kind provisions considered as the basis for the health 
insurance and pension funds; 
  b. income derived from enterprising; 
  c. sick pay in case of illness 
  d. pension payments; 
  e. child care support payments, and child care fees; 
  f. housing rental income (sublet fees) and rent received 
for non housing premises. 
  149.3. In determining the amount of family aid 
payments, the income and earnings from any source of the 
entitled person shall be considered by deducting the amounts 
paid for health insurance, pension and employee contributions, 
personal income taxes, and advance income tax payments from the 
income and earnings. 
  149.4. If a person has earnings or income from 
several sources, all sources shall be taken into consideration. 
  149.5. The amount of earnings and income per 
Paragraph 149.2. shall not include moneys received in the form of 
  a. expectant mothers' supplement; 
  b. family supplement; 
  c. income supplement; 
  d. fees received by families for raising wards of the state; 
  e. court ordered alimony received by the person entitled to 
family aid; 
  f. fees to which a woman taking unpaid leave of absence for 
child care purposes (a woman receiving child care aid or child 
care fee) is entitled for caring for a child other than hers, or 
based on part-time employment (membership); 
  g. any state subsidy to which dependents pursuing studies, 
or support (scholarship) based on a study agreement, and 
further, income supplement that accompanies such subsidies or 
support. The average earning to which persons pursuing studies 
in the framework of a day time curriculum are entitled based on 
employment prior to the commencement of studies shall not be 
disregarded based on this provision; 
  h. payments to blind persons; 
  i. residential maintenance subsidies. 
  150.1. If prior to his induction an enlisted man 
was obligated by court order to pay alimony, the amount of 
family aid--even in the absence of other conditions--shall be 
equal to the amount of court ordered alimony, but in no event 
more than the amount of family aid to be paid pursuant to 
Paragraph 159. below. 
  150.2. If an enlisted man's obligation to pay 
alimony was incurred after his induction, the beneficiary--even 
in the absence of other conditions--shall receive the amount of 
family aid to which the former is entitled. 
  150.3. The amount corresponding to the amount of 
family aid in lieu of court ordered alimony shall not be 
deducted from a person discharged from enlisted military service. 
  151.1. A person who has been called up or his 
relative may submit a petition for family aid to the municipal 
clerk, after receipt of the call up order. 
  151.2. The municipal clerk shall judge the 
petition within 30 days from date of receipt. He shall forward 
his determination to the petitioner, to the selective service 
command having jurisdiction, and for the payment of aid, to the 
Pension Disbursement Directorate of the National Pension 
Insurance Chief Directorate (hereinafter: Pension Disbursement 
Directorate). 
  151.3. Family aid shall be paid to only one 
entitled person per household. 
  152.1. The need to pay family aid may be 
determined beginning on the first day of the month following 
induction at the earliest, and shall be paid retroactively and 
monthly at the end of each month. 
  152.2. Regarding claims filed after induction, 
entitlement to family aid shall be granted retroactively for not 
more than six months, beginning on the first day of the sixth 
month prior to filing the claim. 
  153. Family aid payments shall be terminated if 
  a. enlisted military service ceases for any reason; 
  b. the enlisted man discontinues his enlisted service 
contrary to law, provided that this fact is determined and 
affirmed; 
  c. any condition related to the entitlement of the aided 
dependent ceases; 
  d. the person entitled to receive family aid is under 
preliminary arrest or serves a prison sentence; 
  e. the person entitled to receive family aid is abroad for 
a period exceeding one month. 
  154. Payment of family aid shall be terminated on 
the last day of the month following the termination of enlisted 
military service, or if any condition affecting entitlement to 
receive aid has ceased. 
  155.1. A dependent may request an increase in the 
amount of family aid payments if a change occurs in the 
dependent's earning (income) situation after the granting of 
family aid, justifying the increase of family aid payments. In 
such situations the amount of family aid payments shall be 
increased beginning on the first day of the month following the 
change. If a late claim is filed, the higher amount of family 
aid may be paid beginning on the first day of the sixth months 
prior to filing the claim. 
  155.2. Dependents shall report changes requiring a 
reduction in the amount of, or termination of family aid 
payments in writing to the municipal clerk within eight days 
from the change. In such cases the amount of family aid shall be 
reduced beginning the first day of the month following the 
change. 
  156.1. Selective service commands shall notify the 
Pension Disbursement Directorate and the municipal clerk within 
eight days of termination of a person's enlisted military 
service, by conveying the appropriate data. 
  156.2. The Honved Forces shall reimburse losses 
incurred as a result of failure to provide the notice required 
in Paragraph 156.1. 
  157.1. Dependents shall repay family aid payments 
they were not entitled to receive. The dependent and the 
enlisted man whose induction served as a basis for granting 
family aid to the dependent, and who shares the same household 
with the dependent shall have joint responsibility for repayment. 
  157.2. If family aid payments a dependent is not 
entitled to receive as per Paragraph 157.1., is not repaid based 
on a notice received from the Pension Disbursement Directorate 
despite the municipal clerk's determination, the amount of such 
aid shall be collected the same way as taxes. 
  158. No funds shall be deducted from family aid 
payments to which a dependent of the soldier performing enlisted 
service is entitled to receive, nor shall such payments be used 
to offset [other] aid. 
  The amount of family aid 
  159.1. The amount of family aid shall be the 
difference between the earnings or income received from any 
source of the dependent in need of support, and the amount 
specified in Paragraph 148. 
  159.2. The amount of the monthly payment of family 
aid to one household shall not exceed the quadruple of the 
monthly amount of minimum pension payment acquired on one's own 
right. 
  Family aid to soldiers discharged for illness 
  160.1. Family aid payments shall be continued to 
be made for no longer than a year from the date of discharge to 
dependents of persons of military age discharged from enlisted 
service for reasons of illness or accident, and receiving aid to 
replace sick pay. 
  160.2. Continued payment of family aid pursuant to 
Paragraph 160.1. shall be made at the request of the person of 
military age discharged from enlisted service due to illness, 
based on a certificate issued by the selective service command 
for this purpose. The certificate shall be submitted to the 
Pension Disbursement Directorate and the municipal clerk. 
  161.1. Except for the payment of funds required in 
Paragraphs 90., 141., and 143.1., the cost of, and expenditures 
related to the mandatory functions of local governments related 
to mandatory military service shall be paid from standard state 
subsidies appropriated in each fiscal year by the National 
Assembly. 
  161.2. The costs of, and expenditures related to 
the performance of functions specified in Paragraphs 90., 141., 
and 143.1., shall be paid from the budgets of the Ministry of 
Defense and the Ministry of the Interior, in proportion to the 
number of persons of military age [in a given municipality]. 
  The pay, in kind provisions and other allowances of 
persons of military age performing military service 
  162.1. Persons of military age performing military 
service shall be entitled to receive pay, free of charge in kind 
provisions, and other allowances during their military service 
at the place of service. 
  162.2. Only the advance personal income tax 
payments, charges against wages, and obligations incurred in the 
form of alimony (contributions for purposes of maintenance) 
shall be deducted from the pay of reservists and auxiliary 
reservists performing military service. 
  162.3. For purposes of deducting alimony payments 
(contributions for purposes of maintenance), employers shall 
certify the amount to be deducted and shall forward such 
certification to the selective service command having 
jurisdiction at the registered place of residence of the 
reservist or auxiliary reservist performing military service. 
  162.4. No deductions shall be made from the pay 
received by enlisted men. 
  Onetime payment to persons discharged from enlisted 
service 
  163.1. To facilitate adaptation to civilian life, 
soldiers discharged from enlisted service may be granted a 
onetime pay (discharge aid) in due regard to their social 
welfare situation and health condition. 
  163.2. Discharge aid shall be paid from funds 
allocated in the budget of the Honved Forces and the Border 
Guard respectively. 
  Social security and state provisions 
  164. Persons performing national defense 
obligations and their dependents shall be entitled to receive 
health care provisions, accidental injury provisions, disability 
pension, dependent pension, and spouse's supplement based on the 
law governing social security and the general provisions of the 
law governing the implementation of social security, with 
deviations as provided for in this Law. They may be entitled to 
payments in the form of aid to replace sick pay and family 
supplement, as part of state aid. 
  Therapeutic and preventive services 
  165.1. The health care services of the armed 
forces shall provide health care services to persons performing 
military service for illnesses contracted, or accidents suffered 
during military service. State and local government health care 
services may also be used if necessary. 
  165.2. As part of therapeutic and preventive 
service provisions, persons in need of medical care pursuant to 
Paragraph 83.5, persons performing enlisted, reserve, or 
auxiliary reserve military services, as well as persons 
discharged from the military due to illness contracted or 
accident suffered during military service, shall be entitled to 
receive free of charge pharmaceuticals and therapeutic auxiliary 
equipment, and dentures in case of a 50 percent deterioration in 
their ability to chew until their final condition is determined 
or until they are able to earn an income. 
  165.3. Dependents entitled to receive family aid 
shall also be entitled to receive free of charge pharmaceutical 
and therapeutic auxiliary equipment during the military service 
of the the person of military age. 
  Providing for the burial of soldiers 
  166. Persons of military age deceased during their 
military service, or within one year from the date of discharge 
due to an accident or illness related to military service shall 
be buried at the expense of the armed forces. Payments for 
burial shall be charged against the respective budgets of the 
armed forces. 
  Sick pay and aid to replace sick pay 
  167.1. Persons of military age entitled to receive 
sick pay and under medical care (Paragraph 83.5.) shall be 
entitled to receive sick pay for a maximum of one year during 
the period in which they are unable to earn income, irrespective 
of the duration of the continuous insurance of the person 
treated, and of the time during which sick pay has been received 
prior to the inability to earn an income. 
  167.2. Persons receiving medical care, but not 
qualified pursuant to Paragraph 167.1. shall receive aid to 
replace sick pay if their inability to earn an income lasts for 
more than a month, for the duration of their inability to earn 
an income, but in no event for a period exceeding one year. The 
amount of aid to replace sick pay shall be 75 percent of the 
monthly minimum wage of a full time employee, as such amounts 
are determined at the time of payment. 
  167.3. The daily amount of sick pay shall not be 
less than the amount paid in the form of aid to replace sick pay. 
  167.4. The amount of aid to replace sick pay shall 
be determined and paid by the social security administrative 
organ having jurisdiction at the registered place of residence 
of the beneficiary. 
  168.1. An insured person of military age becoming 
unable to earn an income within 15 days after his discharge, or 
whose insurance has terminated within 15 days prior to his 
induction to military service, shall be entitled to receive sick 
pay. 
  168.2. A person of military age becoming unable to 
earn an income within 15 days after his discharge, and not 
eligible for sick pay based on Paragraph 168.1. above, shall be 
entitled to receive aid to replace sick pay if his inability to 
earn an income lasts for a period less than a month. 
  168.3. The provisions of Paragraph 168. shall be 
appropriately applied to determine the length of entitlement for 
aid, and the amount of aid to be provided. 
  169. The time period during which provisions are 
made pursuant to Paragraphs 167. and 168. shall not decrease the 
time period of subsequent provisions based on a subsequent 
inability to earn an income. 
  Benefits based on accidental injury 
  170.1. Persons performing national defense 
obligations shall be entitled to accidental injury benefits if 
they suffer an accidental injury or illness related to the 
performance of service. Injuries suffered by persons performing 
national defense obligations while traveling to their duty 
stations or from their duty stations (home, place of abode, 
workplace) shall be regarded as accidental injuries suffered 
while performing national defense obligations. 
  170.2. The injured person shall be entitled to 
receive accidental injury benefits in the form of accidental 
injury sick pay, accidental injury benefits, or accidental 
disability pension, and his dependents shall be entitled to 
receive dependents' accidental injury pension. 
  171.1. From the standpoint of the relationship of 
an accident to the performance of national defense obligations, 
an accident shall be: 
  a. an injury, or death resulting from an injury suffered 
while the soldier performs his military duty or the duty to 
appear, as that relates to the performance of national defense 
obligations; and 
  b. an illness, or death resulting from an illness 
contracted or aggravated as a result of the special hazards 
involved in the performance of national defense obligations. 
  171.2. An accident suffered while performing 
military duty shall qualify under Paragraph 171.1. only if it 
occurred during the performance of service duty, or in the 
course of exercising service related rights. 
  171.3. The term "military duty" shall be 
understood to mean conduct specified by law, rules and 
regulations, commands or other directives, or anticipated 
reasonable conduct based on such specifications. 
  171.4. The term "exercising service related 
rights" shall mean conduct authorized or permitted under 
Paragraph 171.3 and manifested at the duty station, or in the 
course of organized participation at a function outside the duty 
station. 
  171.5. An accident, illness, or death shall not be 
deemed to be related to the performance of national defense 
obligations if a person with military-service status caused it 
deliberately or in violation of prohibitions, or if it resulted 
exclusively from the injured person's own fault due to his 
intoxicated or dazed condition. 
  172.1. The relationship between accidents, 
illnesses, or death to the performance of national defense 
functions shall be investigated on an ex officio basis. 
  172.2. A record shall be prepared of the death, of 
an accident suffered by a person performing his national defense 
obligation disabling him in excess of two days, or of an illness 
related to national defense obligations, which is anticipated to 
have a long-term disabling effect. The commander in charge of 
personnel shall provide for the preparation of a record. 
  172.3. Regarding persons performing their 
compulsory military duty, the commander in charge of personnel 
shall issue a determination, stating whether the death, the 
accident, or the illness is related to the performance of 
military obligation (qualifying determination). 
  172.4. The qualifying determination shall be made 
in writing, and shall be forwarded to the person of military age 
or a close relative. 
  172.5. Determinations pursuant to Paragraph 172.4. 
shall be subject to appeal within 15 days from date of delivery 
to the minister of defense, and to the minister of the interior 
in case the subject of the determination is a border guard. The 
minister's decision may be challenged in court within 30 days 
from the date of the decision. 
  172.6. If an accident or death occurs in the 
course of performing civil defense or civilian service 
obligations, proceedings shall be initiated pursuant to social 
security rules pertaining to accidents in workplaces and to 
occupational diseases. 
  173.1. If the health impairment stemming from an 
accident is expected to cause disability in excess of 15 
percent, the person performing his military duty shall be 
referred to the military review board having jurisdiction 
(hereinafter: FUV). 
  173.2. If a person of military age is not referred 
to FUV during his military service for an accident or illness 
related to the performance of national defense obligations, and 
if as a result of the accident or illness his health condition 
worsens, or his disability, entitling him to receive accidental 
injury benefits increases, action shall be taken to present the 
person of military age to FUV upon his request, or upon the 
request of a dependent sharing the same household. 
  172.3. FUV shall state its opinion supported by 
reasoned argument concerning the relationship of the accident or 
illness to the performance of national defense duty. 
  Accidental injury sick pay 
  174.1. A person unable to earn an income due to an 
accident stemming from the performance of his national defense 
obligation shall be entitled to receive accidental injury sick 
pay. Accidental injury sick pay shall be paid beginning on the 
calendar day following discharge at the earliest, until the 
disability ceases. 
  174.2. A person simultaneously entitled to receive 
aid to replace sick pay and accidental injury sick pay shall 
receive the benefit providing the higher amount of benefit. 
  175. Accidental injury benefits shall also be paid 
to persons entitled to receive such benefits while performing 
national defense obligations. 
  Accidental disability pension benefit 
  176.1. Any person disabled to a degree of at least 
67 percent related mainly to the performance of national defense 
obligations, shall be entitled to receive accidental disability 
pension. 
  176.2. While performing national defense 
obligations, a person entitled to receive accidental injury 
benefits shall receive Grade 4 benefits. 
  177. A person of military age who received skills 
training during his military service, shall, upon his request, 
receive accidental disability pension benefits in amounts based 
on the average earnings of employees performing identical 
skilled work. 
  Accidental death benefits for dependents 
  178. Dependents of a deceased person having 
performed his military obligations (Paragraph 145.2.) shall be 
entitled to receive widows' pension, severance pay, orphans' 
support payments, or parents' pension benefits, provided that 
  a. death resulted from an accident related to the 
performance of national defense obligations, or 
  b. the person performing national defense obligations 
received accidental disability pension, or would have been 
entitled to receive such pension. 
  179.1. The widows' pension to by paid to the widow 
of a soldier killed in action shall amount to 70 percent of the 
amount to which her husband is, or would have been entitled to 
receive as accidental disability pension Grade II. 
  179.2. Widows' accidental death pension benefits 
pursuant to Paragraph 179.1. may be granted if she lived with 
her husband until his death. 
  179.3. A soldier deceased while performing his 
national defense obligations may be declared by the minister of 
defense to have been killed in action; deceased border guards 
may be declared by the minister of the interior to have been 
killed in action. 
  180.1. The orphan of a person killed in action 
shall receive orphans' support based on widows' pension 
specified in Paragraph 179., even if the widow does not receive 
pension benefits, or receives widows pension benefits under an 
entitlement other than that specified in Paragraph 179. 
  180.2. The amount of the pension to which a parent 
(grandparent) of a person killed in action is entitled shall be 
the same as the amount of the widow's pension to which the widow 
of the person killed in action is, or would be entitled. 
  180.3. The combined total amount of accidental 
death benefits to which the dependents of a person killed in 
action are entitled shall not exceed 2.5 times the amount to 
which his wife living in the same household is, or would be 
entitled. 
  Disability pension 
  181.1. A person of military age shall be entitled 
to disability pension benefits if he was discharged from 
military service for health reasons not related to the 
performance of military duty, provided that he has become at 
least 67 percent disabled within two years after the date of 
discharge, and provided that he has served long enough to 
acquire eligibility for a disability pension as that length of 
time applies to early disability pension recipients. 
  181.2. A person of military age discharged on 
grounds specified in Paragraph 181.1. shall be entitled to 
receive a disability pension for military service prior to the 
age of 22, irrespective of the length of time served. 
  Pension benefits for dependents 
  182.1. Pursuant to this law, dependents shall be 
entitled to receive pension benefits if: 
  a. a person of military age has died while performing 
military service, and his death was not related to the 
performance of national defense obligations, or if he was 
discharged from military service for reasons not related to the 
performance of national defense obligations, and has died within 
two years from date of discharge; and if 
  b. the person of military age has served for the length of 
time prescribed in Paragraph 181., or has died before reaching 
the age of 22. 
  181.2. If the person of military age received sick 
pay or aid to replace sick pay after his discharge based on an 
illness not related to the performance of his national defense 
obligation, the two year period mentioned in Paragraph 181. 
shall be counted from the day when payment of sick pay or aid to 
replace sick pay ceased. 
  Award and payment of accidental injury or death 
benefits, and other pension benefits 
  183.1. Accidental injury or death benefits shall 
be awarded and paid by the organs awarding sick pay, and shall 
be paid from social security funds. 
  183.2. Accidental injury or death benefits, and 
other pension benefits based on this law shall be awarded by the 
social security organ having jurisdiction at the registered 
address of the person of military age, based on claims filed by 
the selective service command. 
  183.3. Claims pursuant to Paragraphs 183.1. and 
183.2. shall be submitted by the person of military age or by a 
dependent residing in the same household with the person of 
military age. The selective service commands shall have an 
obligation to report such claims upon the request of the person 
of military age or his dependent residing in the same household. 
  184.1. If a claim is filed by the interested 
person, the social security administrative organ shall, without 
delay, contact the affected organ to obtain the data needed to 
make the award. 
  184.2. If the person of military duty was 
discharged from military service, the selective service command 
shall communicate within eight days, on the basis of data 
available, the dates when the discharged person started and 
ended his military service, and the reason for discharge, and 
shall forward the determination showing whether death, 
accidental injury, or illness is related to the performance of 
national defense obligations. 
  185. The amounts of accidental death or injury 
benefits, as well as other benefits shall be determined on the 
basis of earnings prior to induction for military service. A 
person of military age who has earned no income, or whose income 
was lower than the mandatory minimum wage payable to employees 
at the time of paying the benefits, shall be awarded benefits 
based on the latter amount. 
  186. The extent to which a person's ability to 
work has been reduced, the degree of disability that serves as 
the basis for awarding accidental injury benefits and other 
benefits shall be determined by the National Institute of 
Medical Experts of the National Health Insurance Fund. 
  187.1. The views of the selective service command 
shall be heard prior to making a decision in response to action 
seeking legal recourse against determinations to be made by 
social security administrative organ with respect to benefits 
specified in Paragraph 183.2. 
  187.2. Unless otherwise provided for by law, the 
provisions of the social security law and its implementing 
provisions shall be applied regarding legal recourse and the 
repayment of benefits received without legal entitlement. 
  Provisions for disabled servicemen or their 
dependentsentitled to military disability benefits 
  188.1 It shall be the function of the state to 
provide, under separate law, for persons who suffered wartime 
injuries and their dependents. 
  188.2. The livelihood of such persons shall be 
secured based on payments in the form of money and in kind 
provisions. 
  188.3. Persons entitled to such provisions shall 
be provided for as war invalids, wards of the war, war widows, 
war orphans, or as family members of these. 
  189.1. Municipal clerks shall perform the 
administrative functions related to provisions specified in 
Paragraph 188. 
  189.2. When registering persons for provisions 
under Paragraph 188., an examination shall be made to determine 
whether more favorable provisions can be granted under the 
provisions of this law to the person in need of care or his 
relative. Claimants shall be informed of the opportunity of 
receiving care under more favorable conditions. 
  Indemnification for damages suffered by persons 
performing national defense obligation 
  190.1. The organ for which the national defense 
obligation was performed shall be responsible for damages 
suffered in the course of performing such national defense 
obligation, irrespective of who is to be blamed for the damage. 
Such organs shall be relieved from responsibility if they are 
able to prove that the damage was unavoidable due to a cause not 
under its control, or was caused exclusively by the 
unpreventable conduct of the person who suffered damages. That 
part of the damages claimed which were caused by the culpable 
conduct of the person who suffered the damages shall not be 
indemnified. 
  190.2. Provisions of a separate law relating to 
the indemnification responsibility of the armed forces shall be 
applied to indemnification, irrespective of the form in which 
national defense obligations were performed. 
<H6>  Chapter VIII </H6>
  SERVICE AND SUPPLY PROVISION OBLIGATIONS 
  The obligation to provide. 
  191.1. In the interest of performing national 
defense preparation and national mobilization tasks, persons and 
organizations enumerated in Paragraph 69.3. shall 
  a. provide services and tangible assets specified by law, 
or shall tolerate the use of such services and assets; 
  b. refrain from pursuing certain activities; 
  c. engage in activities needed to prepare for the use of 
such provisions; 
  d. convey the data needed to plan the use of such 
provisions (hereinafter the provisions specified in Subsections 
a.-d.: provisions). 
  191.2. Except during extraordinary or emergency 
conditions, requests for data enabling the performance of tasks 
specified in Paragraph 191.1. above shall not include data 
related to the conduct of business, but not related to the 
required provisions. Thus, the following data shall not be 
requested: 
  a. efficiency indicators of an enterprise; 
  b. credit and capital conditions; 
  c. financial indexes related to taxation; 
  d. intellectual creations subject to legal protection; 
  e. data related to capacities subject to contract; and 
  f. wage and social security data not related to 
indemnification. 
  191.3. In ordering the use of provisions, the 
interests of government administration, public utilities and 
public supplies, as well as the legitimate interests of the 
person required to make the provisions shall be considered, and 
the proportionate distribution of burden shall be ensured. 
  191.4. No provisions shall be required if the same 
can be ordered based on the authority of other law, or if the 
provisions can be acquired otherwise. 
  192.1. If necessary, and if national defense 
interests cannot be satisfied otherwise or at the appropriate 
time, or if these interests can be satisfied only at 
disproportionate cost, the following needs shall be satisfied by 
using provisions as per Paragraph 191.1.: Goods and services 
needed for 
  a. the functioning and mobilization of the armed forces and 
law and order organs; 
  b. the undisturbed functioning of the country's 
governmental and governmental administrative system; 
  c. the preparation of the country's economy for the 
performance of defense tasks presenting themselves during 
extraordinary or emergency conditions, for the preservation of 
the functioning of the country's economy, or, if necessary, for 
the restoration of the functioning of the country's economy; 
  d. the performance of civil defense tasks. 
  192.2. Based on this Law, the following may 
already be ordered during the period of national defense 
preparation in order to perform the tasks specified in Paragraph 
192.1.: 
  a. reporting and maintaining in a condition suitable for 
use certain real property designated to be used for national 
defense purposes (including transportation, news reporting, 
telecommunication, infrastructural networks and facilities, 
too,) and further, some movable things (machines, public road, 
water, and air transportation vehicles, railroad rolling stock 
and other technical means and accessories, spare parts), as well 
as the reporting of changes in these data. 
  b. accumulation of reserves and inventories to support the 
basic needs of the populace, and to maintain the functioning of 
the economy; 
  c. the performance of preparatory activities needed for the 
delivery of provisions, including planning and the establishment 
of organizations; 
  d. on the scene verification of the truthfulness of reports 
and of the feasibility to perform on the obligations; the 
termination of deficiencies revealed as a result of the 
verifications; 
  e. temporary use of real and movable property needed for 
the functioning of the armed forces, law and order organs, and 
defense administration, their exercises, manpower supplementing 
efforts, and mobilization. 
  192.3. Data obtained to enable the planning of the 
use of provisions shall not be used for purposes other than 
national defense. 
  192.4. In delivering the provisions specified in 
Paragraph 192.2., indemnification shall be provided for 
pecuniary disadvantages directly related to the delivery of 
provisions. 
  Exemptions 
  193.1.The following shall be exempt from making 
provisions: 
  a. the National Assembly, the Constitutional Court, the 
Office of the President of the Republic, the Office of the Prime 
Minister, the various ministries, the Supreme Court, the Supreme 
Prosecutor's Office, and the central bank; 
  b. the armed forces and law and order organs; 
  c. local government, government administration, and 
judicial organs to the extent necessary for the performance of 
their basic functions and national defense tasks; 
  d. churches, religious denominations with respect to 
objects and rights, which directly serve the purpose of 
performing church or religious tasks; 
  e. political parties represented in the National Assembly, 
to the extent needed to be represented in parliament; 
  f. employers' and employee's interest groups regarding 
objects indispensable for the performance of their interest 
representation functions; 
  g. public transportation organizations created for the 
purpose of transporting people or goods, or which perform this 
activity under a concessionary agreement, to the extent 
necessary from the standpoint of the vital transportation of 
people or goods; 
  h. persons or organizations performing public service or 
public utility activities, and in particular, those providing 
electricity, water, gas, remote heating, sewage and communal 
waste removal functions or managing such plants, to an extent 
indispensable from the standpoint of performing their ordained 
functions, including the related defense and security areas; 
  i. those who perform other production or service activities 
indispensable from the standpoint of the vital interests of the 
populace, if exempted by the authority intending to use such 
activities. 
  193.2. Hospitals, health care therapeutic and care 
institutions, pharmacies, as well as their health care equipment 
may be used only for purposes of health care service delivery. 
  193.3. The implements of organs specialized in the 
mitigation of natural and industrial catastrophes may be used 
for civil defense purposes only, except when used for military 
purposes. 
  Authorities ordering use 
  194.1. The use of services and tangible assets 
[hereinafter: requisitioning] may be ordered by 
  a. the Government nationwide, or, if authorized by the 
Government, by the minister responsible for a given activity; 
  b. within their respective jurisdictions the regional 
prefects of the Republic and the mayors; 
  c. the commander of the selective service command in cases 
defined, and consistent with conditions established by law, and 
in exceptional cases by the military commander having 
jurisdiction (hereinafter Subsections a. through c. jointly: 
requisitioning authority). 
  194.2. The Government shall 
  a. establish procedural rules for requisitioning; 
  b. order the performance of provisions of a national scope 
and significant from the standpoint of national defense; 
  194.3. The responsible minister shall 
  a. establish rules for the preparation and performance of 
provisions within his scope of authority; 
  b. order the requisitioning of production and supply 
services, and of infrastructural networks not within the 
Government's scope of authority. 
  194.4. The regional prefects of the Republic shall 
  a. order the requisitioning of real property and provisions 
needed for government operations; 
  b. determine the scope of provisions, identify those 
obligated to perform, and order the requisitioning of provisions; 
  c. order the requisitioning of real property needed by the 
armed forces and law and order organs in case of mobilization, 
and provisions needed for their operations. 
  194.5. The mayor shall 
  a. order the performance of provisions needed for the 
protection and supply of local government administration and the 
populace; 
  b. requisition real property for the placement of persons 
or things; 
  c. render decisions in every case not under the 
jurisdiction of other requisitioning authorities. 
  194.6. The commander of the selective service 
command shall be authorized to order the requisitioning of 
provisions related to secure technical means for mobilization. 
  194.7. In times of extraordinary or emergency 
conditions, if as a result of time lost due to action taken by 
the regional prefect of the republic, the commander of the 
selective service command, or the mayor a grave and imminent 
threat to military interests exists, a battalion or higher level 
commander having jurisdiction may directly requisition motor 
vehicles, technical work machinery, fuel containers and the 
needed fuel. Such requisitioning shall be communicated in the 
form of a determination to the person required to fulfill his 
obligation, and an appropriate receipt shall be given to the 
person responding to the demands of such a requisition. 
  195.1. Requisitions affecting select individuals 
shall be communicated to such individuals in the form of 
determinations. 
  195.2. The determination shall name the 
requisitioning authority and the person obligated to provide, 
data suitable to identify the subject of the requisition, the 
date of, or deadline for the provision, and a designation of the 
person authorized to receive the provisions. 
  196.1. A determination to requisition may be 
declared to have an immediate effect, and shall not be subject 
to appeal. 
  196.2. A person obligated to make provisions may 
challenge in court the related determination within 30 days from 
date of receipt of the same. 
  Indemnification 
  197.1. Except in cases specified by law, providers 
of services and tangible assets shall be entitled to 
indemnification for financial disadvantages suffered. 
  197.2. Unless otherwise provided for by law, 
indemnification shall be made pursuant to the rules of civil law. 
  197.3. No indemnification shall be due if 
  a. the requisitioning did not hinder the proper use of the 
subject requisitioned; 
  b. the damage would have occurred even if not 
requisitioned; 
  c. the damage was caused by the enemy. 
  198.1. Indemnification proceedings in the first 
instance, and determinations as to the amount of indemnification 
shall be conducted or made by the requisitioning authority. 
  198.2. Proceedings in the first instance shall be 
conducted by the ministry having jurisdiction regarding 
requisitions made by a ministry based on the order of its 
minister, and by the Finance Ministry, if the requisitioning 
authority was a minister without portfolio or the Government. 
  198.3. The regional prefect of the Republic shall 
judge appeals, if a mayor was the requisitioning authority in 
the first instance. 
  198.4. If the regional prefect of the Republic 
proceeded in the first instance, the minister directing the 
requisitioning organ shall judge claims for indemnification. 
  198.5. If, in the first instance, the commander of 
the selective service command, or the commander having 
jurisdiction pursuant to Paragraph 194.7. ordered the 
requisitioning, the chief of staff of the Honved Forces shall 
render a decision in the second instance. 
  198.6. Determinations of amounts of 
indemnification for provisions ordered by the Government or by a 
minister having jurisdiction shall not be subject to appeal. 
  198.7. Persons objecting to administrative 
decisions involving indemnification may file petitions in court 
within 30 days. Appeals and petitions shall have no delaying 
effect insofar as compliance with the obligation to provide is 
concerned. 
  198.8. The Government shall decree detailed 
procedural rules for indemnification. 
<H6>  Chapter IX </H6>
  DETAILED RULES TO BE FOLLOWED DURINGEXTRAORDINARY 
AND EMERGENCY CONDITIONS 
  EXTRAORDINARY MEASURES 
  General provisions 
  199.1. This chapter contains rules for measures 
that may be implemented under extraordinary conditions 
(hereinafter: extraordinary measures). 
  199.2. Under emergency conditions, the president 
of the Republic may introduce extraordinary measures specified 
in Paragraphs 202.-207., 210.-234., 239.-243., and 245.-248. of 
this law, as well as in other laws. 
  199.3. In cases specified in Paragraph 19/E.1. of 
the Constitution, and for the achievement of goals within the 
scope and extent specified therein, the Government may introduce 
measures specified in Paragraphs 202.-204., 206.-208., 
213.-217., 220.-221., 234., 243., and 245.-247. of this law, as 
well as in Paragraph 19/E.2. of the Constitution. 
  199.4. For purposes of this Law, the term "decree" 
shall mean decrees promulgated by the National Defense Council 
during extraordinary conditions; and under emergency conditions, 
extraordinary measures decreed by the president of the Republic, 
and in cases specified in Paragraph 19/E.1. of the Constitution, 
by the Government. 
  199.5. Within his area of jurisdiction, the 
regional prefect of the Republic shall decree area-wide 
requirements and tasks to implement extraordinary measures 
introduced under extraordinary or emergency conditions, or in 
cases specified in Paragraph 19/E.1. of the Constitution, 
measures introduced by the Government. 
  200. No legal provision in conflict with 
extraordinary measures introduced during extraordinary or 
emergency conditions shall be enforced. 
  201.1. The Government is hereby authorized to 
draft decrees ready to be promulgated by the National Defense 
Council and the president of the Republic. The drafting of 
decrees shall be accomplished by appropriately applying the 
rules applicable to legislation. 
  201.2. Copies of the drafts shall be forwarded to 
persons authorized to make decisions, and to persons (organs) 
responsible for their implementation. 
  Extraordinary measures that may be introduced 
regarding national defense administration 
  202. Rules different from those applicable in 
times of peace may be established regarding the service 
relationship of the professional members of the active military 
and law and order organs (extraordinary service). 
  203.1. Based on decree: 
  a. admission to the professional staff of the armed forces 
shall be suspended; 
  b. members of the professional staff shall not resign from 
the service, and members of the active duty personnel shall not 
resign their ranks; 
  c. persons called up for enlisted, reserve, or auxiliary 
reserve military service may be retained in service as long as 
necessary; 
  d. the beginning and the end of extraordinary service may 
be adjusted consistent with the duration of the extraordinary or 
emergency conditions; 
  e. separate rules may be established for promotions in rank; 
  f. rules different from those applicable to appointments 
to, and relief from assignments, detachments, ordering, 
supplies, leaves, and disciplinary responsibility, and further, 
other rules pertaining to extraordinary service may be 
established in a manner different from those in force; 
  g. rules for protecting the interests of persons performing 
extraordinary service shall be established in the interest of 
appreciation, financial support, as well as recognition and 
protection of their interests. 
  203.2. Entitlements and benefits acquired by 
members of the armed forces and law and order organs during 
their extraordinary service may also be enforced after the 
termination of extraordinary or emergency conditions. 
  204.1. Rules more favorable than the generally 
applicable rules may be decreed to protect the interests of 
persons performing extraordinary service. 
  204.2. The interest protection rules of the law 
may be extended to cover persons performing other national 
defense obligations. 
  204.3. Based on decree: 
  a. rules different than those applicable in times of peace 
may be established regarding the pay of persons performing 
extraordinary services, and if so, part of the pay shall be 
forwarded to a dependent or shall be deposited; b. dependents 
of persons performing extraordinary service not receiving 
support shall be granted family aid; 
  c. dependents of persons transferred from extraordinary 
service to reserve status due to injury, accident, or illness 
shall be entitled to receive family aid payments for the 
duration of the illness; 
  d. additional interest protection rules may be established. 
  205. Orders of merit, medals of merit, and 
commemoration medals may be established by decree for members of 
the armed forces and law and order organs performing 
extraordinary service, in recognition of their merits. 
  206.1. A decree may establish more favorable rules 
of financial responsibility and procedural rules for damages 
caused by persons performing extraordinary services, than those 
specified in legal provisions regarding the financial 
responsibility of members of the armed forces and law and order 
organs vis a vis their organizations. 
  206.2. Based on decree: 
  a. obligations of persons performing extraordinary services 
to indemnify for damages caused shall be limited to 
intentionally caused damages, or damages that materialize as a 
result of a criminal act; 
  b. in case of damages other than those specified in 
Subsection a., data pertaining to the person inflicting the 
damages, and the factual conditions of damages caused shall be 
the only data recorded; 
  c. damages or shortages caused by enemy activities shall be 
regarded in damage assessment proceedings as damages caused by 
external forces that could not be prevented; 
  d. no indemnification shall be collected from persons 
performing extraordinary services. 
  Extraordinary measures related to government 
administration, public order, and public security 
  207.1. Mayors and municipal clerks may also be 
assigned state administrative tasks by decree. 
  207.2. With the exception of the provisions of 
Paragraph 10.k. of the Local Government Law, the authority and 
jurisdiction of local legislative bodies, and of the Budapest 
and county general meetings shall be exercised by the mayor. 
  207.3. The national defense administrative 
functions, and tasks presenting themselves on the basis of 
extraordinary measures shall be performed by mayors and 
municipal clerks pursuant to directions received from the 
regional prefect of the Republic. 
  208. From among rules provided in the law 
concerning general rules of state administrative procedure, the 
following may be changed by decree: 
  a. the scope of proceedings not subject to judicial review; 
  b. determinations of authority and jurisdiction; 
  c. the order of designating a government administrative 
organ to proceed; 
  d. rules for submitting petitions; 
  e. deadlines for action and other deadlines; 
  f. the order of representation; 
  g. the rules for presenting persons; 
  h. the suspension of proceedings; 
  i. the order of legal recourse; 
  j. the rules of implementation. 
  209. The punishment of incarceration may be 
prescribed by decree for violating national defense rules. 
  210.1. Journalists, reporters and newspaper 
publishers (hereinafter: reporters) shall only report 
information that has been cleared by organs authorized to grant 
clearance: the official spokesman, the Hungarian Radio, the 
Hungarian Television, or the MTI. 
  210.2. Reporters may be present at press briefings 
and official functions only if invited by the organ that 
organizes the briefing or function. 
  211.1. Preliminary control of the press and of 
other reports for mass information purposes may be ordered, and 
their publication may be conditioned by the grant of permission. 
  211.2. Permissions to publish shall be issued by 
the military organ that checks the press (military censor). 
  212. Printing presses and operators of other means 
suitable for duplication may be obligated to introduce and 
observe security measures of increased stringency. 
  213.1. Vehicular transportation on public roads, 
railways, waterways and in the air may be restricted to certain 
hours of the day and to certain areas (routes), and may be 
banned temporarily throughout the country or certain parts of 
the country. 
  213.2. In due regard to defense needs, and the 
need to provide public supplies, the regional prefect of the 
Republic may establish requirements that differ from the 
restrictions and prohibition specified in Paragraph 213.1, with 
the concurrence of the minister of the interior, the minister of 
defense, and the minister of transportation, communications and 
water resource management. 
  214.1 The presence of the populace on streets and 
in other public places may be restricted (curfew). 
  214.2. Information about the imposition of a 
curfew, as well as the duration of a curfew shall be conveyed to 
the populace by the radio, television and the press, and by 
posters, and as customary locally. 
  215.1. Functions to be held in public places, 
public assemblies (public functions) shall be held only on the 
basis of an advance permit. 
  215.2. The police chief having jurisdiction shall 
have authority to issue permits for public functions. 
  215.3. The police chief may reject requests for 
permission to hold public functions if such functions violate 
defense interests. Such rejection may be limited to the 
communication of the fact of rejection, without any supportive 
argument. 
  216.1. An order may be issued requiring the 
populace of a certain area of the country to leave for a 
necessary period of time (deportation), and at the same time, a 
new place of stay may be designated for the populace. 
  216.2. The mayor shall provide for the 
transportation of the populace. 
  217. An order may be issued 
  a. restricting stay in certain areas of the country, or 
making such stay conditional on the receipt of a permit; 
  b. making in-bound, out-bound, or transit to, from, or 
through a certain part of the country conditional on the receipt 
of a permit. 
  218.1. Restrictions or prohibitions may be 
established regarding 
  a. the travel of Hungarian citizens abroad; 
  b. the entry of foreigners to Hungary. 
  218.2. A reporting requirement for non-Hungarian 
citizens residing in Hungary may be established, and separate 
rules may be introduced regarding their stay in Hungary. 
  219.1. The manufacture, sale, purchase, 
transportation and storage of explosives for purposes other than 
defense may be restricted or conditional on the receipt of a 
permit. 
  219.2. The following measures may be introduced 
throughout the country, or in any part of the country: 
  a. a prohibition to hunt, to possess hunting and sports 
firearms, to sell weapons and ammunition, or to import weapons 
and ammunition for hunting and sporting purposes, and to use 
non-military target ranges; 
  b. an order to hand in, collect and secure firearms for 
civilian use. 
  220.1. An order may be issued for the continuous 
performance of civil defense duty. 
  220.2. Rules for protection against the effects of 
offensive weapons may be decreed. The following may be 
established as part of such decrees: 
  a. rules for preparing and warning the populace, and rules 
related to shelters and buildings; 
  b. rules for the blackout of railroad, public road, and 
waterway vehicles, and aircraft lights, and of light sources 
that direct their traffic; 
  c. rules for the conduct of the populace. 
  221.1. As part of an advance civil defense 
measure, orders for the removal of tangible assets that are 
important from the standpoint of national defense and the 
national economy may be ordered for the purpose of safeguarding 
(evacuation). 
  221.2. To satisfy the needs of the population and 
to continue production in plants left behind, adequate supplies 
(animals), health care and production supplies shall be left 
behind. The volume of supplies to be left behind shall be 
determined by the mayors, pursuant to measures introduced by the 
regional prefect of the Republic. 
  221.3. The removal of tangible assets may be 
ordered 
  a. on grounds of civil defense by the minister of the 
interior; 
  b. for other important reasons by the minister having 
jurisdiction; 
  c. if contact is lost with central organs providing 
directions, by the regional prefect of the Republic; 
  d. in case of other emergencies by the military commander 
having jurisdiction. 
  221.4. The receiving areas and the directions of 
removal (routes) shall be determined by the person issuing the 
order pursuant to Paragraph 221.3. 
  221.5. The manpower required for the removal and 
securing of tangible assets shall be obtained on the basis of 
national defense work obligation. 
  222. Contact and maintaining relations with 
foreign private persons and legal entities may be restricted. 
  223. Procedures for applying certain provisions of 
international agreements related to diplomatic immunities and 
privileges may be decreed. 
  Extraordinary measures concerning the administration 
of justice 
  224.1. In cases specified by decree, criminal 
proceedings shall not be pursued for acts of lesser significance 
delegated under the authority of local courts. 
  224.2. Local courts shall pursue proceedings in 
cases other than those specified in Paragraph 224.1. only for 
certain crimes for which proceedings are authorized by decree. 
  224.3. Certain crimes shall be decreed to be rules 
violations. 
  224.4. The judgment of a court in the first 
instance shall be subject to appeal only if authorized by decree. 
  224.5. The statute of limitations shall toll with 
respect to cases referred to courts prior to the effective date 
of the decree, if they involve crimes not to be tried under the 
decree, and if judging the case is not within the authority of 
another organ. 
  225. If a decree so requires, courts in the first 
instance shall proceed as sole judges, except in civil and 
criminal cases to be adjudged by judicial councils pursuant to 
decree. 
  226.1. The establishment of new courts and 
prosecutors' offices may be decreed; courts and prosecutors' 
offices already functioning may be combined, separated and 
discontinued; the areas of their jurisdictions may be changed. 
  226.2. Procedures provided by law for the 
appointment of judges and prosecutors, and for their relief from 
duty, and the order of appointing lead judges and prosecutors 
may be changed by decree. The operation of judges' and 
prosecutors' autonomous governing bodies may be suspended. 
  226.3. In the interest of the administration of 
justice, judges may be ordered to temporarily serve as judges in 
other courts. 
  227.1. The establishment of military courts in 
major military districts may be decreed. 
  227.2. Military courts shall proceed in cases 
referred to them as courts in the first instance having general 
authority. 
  228. Separate rules for military criminal 
proceedings may be proclaimed by decree. 
  229.1. Ongoing proceedings shall be suspended for 
a period specified by decree 
  a. in cases in which the decree bars proceedings and no 
other organs has authority to proceed; 
  b. if the defendants or the parties to a suit perform their 
military duty, or if the subject of the suit is located in an 
area of military operation; 
  c. if proceedings cannot be conducted under the 
extraordinary conditions. 
  229.2. The statute of limitations shall toll 
during the period of suspension. Failure to comply with legally 
established deadlines in the proceedings shall not cause a loss 
of rights or other legal disadvantage. 
  230.1. In cases specified by decree 
  a. martial law may be introduced throughout the country, or 
in part of the country, or martial law may be ordered to apply 
in the areas of jurisdiction of military criminal courts; 
  b. martial law may be extended to cover cases involving 
national security, the combat readiness of the armed forces, 
conditions of subordination, or crimes gravely violating the 
rights of citizens, as well as war crimes; 
  c. sanctions under marshall law shall be imprisonment for 
life, or for a period ranging from 10-15 years. Sentences may be 
reduced in exceptional cases. 
  230.2. The introduction of marshal law shall be 
announced by the press, the radio and television, as well by 
other means, as customary in localities. 
  230.3. The county (Budapest) and the military 
courts shall have authority to proceed under marshal law. 
  231. In due regard to extraordinary conditions, 
the minister of justice may change proceedings related to 
pronouncing a person dead, and the factual determination of 
death. 
  232. Decrees may change provisions of criminal, 
material, and procedural law, of civil procedure and procedures 
for out of court settlement, and rules pertaining to the 
enforcement of court orders as well as to procedures applicable 
to notaries public. 
  Extraordinary measures related to obligations for 
service and supply provisions 
  233.1. In order to ensure performance on 
production, supply, and service obligations, persons pursuing 
business activities and obligated to provide services and 
supplies may be required to enter into contracts. 
  233.2. The scope of products and services subject 
to contractual agreements shall be specified by decree. 
  234.1. Rules deviating from those applicable to 
the state household budget may be prescribed by decree. 
  234.2. Based on decree, funds within various 
chapters of the state budget may be rearranged; the allocation 
of certain budgeted funds may be suspended; expenditures not 
included in the budget may be paid, and an extraordinary 
obligation to pay may be prescribed. 
  235.1. The offering of foreign exchange for a 
mandatory purchase may be ordered. Exemptions may be terminated. 
  235.2. The issuance, transfer, or use of foreign 
exchange may be subject to the granting of a permit, and may 
temporarily be suspended. 
  236. Savings deposits, and deposits made from 
winnings, as well as payments based on securities may be 
restricted, and may be temporarily suspended. 
  237. Amounts payable in taxes and dues may be 
changed by decree. 
  238. Foreign trade may be subject to a permit; 
permits already issued may be revoked; trading in previously 
permitted goods and services may be prohibited. The importation 
or exportation of certain products may be mandated. 
  239. Prohibitions and restrictive measures may be 
decreed against countries which discriminate against goods or 
vehicles of Hungarian origin, as compared to goods or vehicles 
originating from other countries. 
  240.1. A decree may mandate the offering for sale 
of precious metals and objects made of precious metals. 
  240.2. The allocation and sale of precious metals 
may be subject to the granting of a permit, or may be suspended. 
  241. The sale of products, consumer goods, and 
energy resources important from the standpoint of the country's 
defense may be restricted. 
  242. Restricted manpower management may be 
introduced by decree. The establishment of employment relations 
may be subject to the involvement of a designated intermediary 
organ. 
  243.1. In the interest of saving lives and 
property, as that becomes necessary under extraordinary 
conditions, the requisitioning of any vehicle, technical or 
agricultural machinery suitable for rescue or salvaging may be 
ordered. 
  243.2. In urgent cases not permitting delay, the 
regional prefect of the Republic, the mayor, or the military 
commander having jurisdiction may order requisitioning. 
  244. The construction of life saving facilities 
(shelters) to protect citizens may be ordered. 
  245. Based on national defense interests, the 
following provisions may be ordered in addition to those 
specified in Paragraph 192.2.: 
  a. the yielding of an entire piece, or part of real 
property for use or utilization, and for remodeling for national 
defense purposes; 
  b. performance on provisions to be made by plants, and 
within that, especially the performance of production, 
transportation, sales and supply activities, provided that the 
plant obligated to make provisions pursues these activities as 
part of its regular business; 
  c. abstaining from making provisions, or termination of 
provisions by plants; 
  d. the provision of transportation services by persons 
possessing means of transportation; 
  e. the surrender of movable property for use or 
utilization; 
  f. the surrender of telephone, telegraph and other 
communication equipment for use, or abstaining from using 
telephone, telegraph, or other communication equipment; 
  g. the use, or the surrender of the premises, studios, 
broadcast transmitters, equipment, and facilities of radio, 
television, and other mass communication institutions for use, 
or abstaining from their use; 
  h. the involvement of expert business organizations in the 
professional direction of the activities of persons obligated to 
make provisions. 
  246. The use, or a restriction on the use of 
repair facilities, stations, harbors, terminals, and warehouses 
may be ordered to ensure the flow of transportation on public 
roads, waterways and in the air. 
  247. The suspension, restriction and control of 
postal and telecommunications services, and the use of 
telecommunication networks and equipment may be ordered. 
  248. A coupon or voucher system may be introduced 
by decree in order to ensure the availability of basic food, 
clothing, and industrial supplies, as well as other public 
necessities to the populace. 
<H6>  Chapter X </H6>
  THE NATIONAL DEFENSE COUNCIL 
  The authority of the National Defense Council 
  249.1. Under extraordinary conditions the National 
Defense Council shall have supreme authority to direct the 
national defense and the armed forces of the Hungarian Republic. 
  249.2. Within this scope of authority, the 
National Defense Council shall direct the: 
  a. defense activities of the armed forces and of organs 
participating in the armed defense of the country; 
  b. defense administrative operations; 
  c. utilization of the country's resources for defense 
purposes, and the satisfaction of the material needs of defense; 
  d. protection of public order, public security and the 
internal order; 
  e. protection of the populace against the effects of 
offensive weapons, and the mitigation of consequences suffered. 
  249.3. The National Defense Council shall 
  a. determine the organization, orientation, and conditions 
of governance; 
  b. except for peace treaties, consummate international 
agreements of outstanding significance to the Hungarian Republic; 
  c. render decisions concerning the transit, stationing, and 
utilization of foreign armed forces across or in the country; 
  d. grant permission to armed forces to cross the Hungarian 
state border to support defensive military operations; 
  e. disband local government representative bodies operating 
contrary to the Constitution and to the decree promulgated by 
the National Defense Council; 
  f. establish an extraordinary system of the regional 
organization of government administration; 
  g. grant amnesty. 
  249.4. In addition to the authority enumerated in 
Paragraph 249.3., the National Defense Council shall exercise 
all National Assembly authority, in the exercise of which that 
body is impeded. 
  250.1. Members of the National Defense Council 
shall be entitled to immunity during the operation of the 
Council. 
  250.2. Members of the National Defense Council 
shall not be held to account by a court or other authority. No 
rules violation or criminal proceeding shall be initiated 
against members of the National Defense Council, nor shall 
coercing measures be applied. 
  250.3. The National Defense Council shall render 
decisions concerning lifting the immunity of members of the 
National Defense Council. The affirmative vote of two-thirds of 
the members of the National Defense Council shall be required 
for a valid decision. 
  251.1. In case of impediment, the following 
officials shall substitute for the various members of the 
National Defense Council: 
  a. the president of the National Assembly, for the 
president of the Republic; 
  b. a vice president of the National Assembly designated by 
that body, for the president of the National Assembly; 
  c. a representative elected by the parliamentary group of 
representatives and reported to the president of the National 
Assembly, for the head of a group of parliamentary 
representatives belonging to a party seated in the National 
Assembly; 
  d. a minister designated by the prime minister, for the 
prime minister; 
  e. the political state secretary, for the minister; 
  f. the chief of staff of the Honved Forces, for the 
commander of the Honved Forces; 
  g. the first deputy of the chief of staff of the Honved 
Forces, for the chief of staff of the Honved Forces. 
  251.2. The chairman or a member of the National 
Defense Council shall be regarded as impeded if 
  a. his mandate ceases for cause specified by law; 
  b. he is outside the country; 
  c. he becomes incapacitated to perform his function; 
  d. his participation in the workings of the National 
Defense Council becomes impossible, due to the brevity of time, 
or the events that prompted the declaration of extraordinary 
conditions. 
  251.3. The fact that an impediment exists, and 
whether substitution is justified shall be determined by the 
National Defense Council. 
  251.4. Prior to the establishment of the National 
Defense Council, the decision pursuant to Paragraph 250.3. shall 
be made by the National Assembly, and if the National Assembly 
is impeded, by the president of the Republic, the president of 
the National Assembly, the chief justice of the Constitutional 
Court, and the prime minister, by a majority vote. 
  The functioning of the National Defense Council 
  252.1. The National Defense Council shall 
establish its order of business in the framework provided by the 
Constitution and this Law. 
  252.2. The National Defense Council shall exercise 
its authority as a body, under the leadership of its chairman. 
  252.3. The National Defense Council shall render 
its decisions in closed meetings. 
  253.1. The National Defense Council shall have a 
quorum when more than half the number of its members is present. 
  253.2. Except for the decision specified in 
Paragraph 250.3., valid decisions of the National Defense 
Council shall be based on the affirmative vote of a simple 
majority of its members. The chairman shall cast the decisive 
vote in case of a tie vote. 
  253.3. Any member of the National Defense Council 
shall be entitled to cast only one vote, even if he performs 
several functions based on the positions held, or substitution 
according to Paragraph 251. A minister heading several 
ministries shall be substituted by the political state 
secretaries of each ministry he heads. In case of the impediment 
of a prime minister who also heads a ministry, the political 
state secretary of the ministry he heads shall also substitute 
for the prime minister with the right to cast one vote, in 
addition to the minister designated pursuant to Paragraph 251.d. 
  254.1. The National Defense Council may render 
decisions regarding matters requiring extraordinary or immediate 
decisions, without convening. In such instances the members of 
the National Defense Council shall state their positions to the 
chairman in writing, by telephone, or through other means of 
data transmission. Minutes shall be taken of verbally conveyed 
information. 
  254.2. The concurrence of a majority of the 
members of the National Defense Council shall be required for a 
valid decision of the National Defense Council if reached 
without convening the Council. 
  254.3. The National Defense Council shall review 
the justification for, and legality of the decisions reached 
pursuant to Paragraphs 254.1. and 254.2., and at the same time 
shall render a decision concerning the suspension or extension 
of the measure introduced. 
  255.1. National Defense Council decisions may be 
initiated by the National Assembly, as well as by the chairman 
and members of the National Defense Council. 
  255.2. The decisions of the National Defense 
Council shall be signed by the president of the Republic and the 
prime minister. 
  256.1. The National Defense Council shall make 
public its decisions in radio and television broadcasts and 
daily newspapers operating in the country, as well as by posters. 
  256.2. Unless otherwise provided, the decree 
promulgated by the National Defense Council shall take effect 
upon publication. 
  256.3. The decree promulgated by the National 
Defense Council shall be proclaimed in MAGYAR KOZLONY. 
<H6>  Chapter XI </H6>
  CLOSING PROVISIONS 
  Diplomatic and other immunities 
  257. The rights and immunities of persons enjoying 
diplomatic or other immunities based on international 
agreements, legal provisions, or reciprocity shall not be 
affected by the provisions of this Law. 
  Exemption from payment of fees 
  258. No fees shall be required to be paid for 
  a. state administrative or court proceedings initiated on 
the basis of this law, or other legal provisions implementing 
this law; 
  b. public documents prepared for purposes of official 
documentation based on this Law. 
  Definitions 
  259.1. In the context of this law 
  a. the term employment shall mean an employer-employee 
relationship, a subcontractor or identical legal relationship, a 
legal relationship with a cooperative having the character of an 
employer-employee relationship, a public service, as well as a 
public employee legal relationship; 
  b. the term employee shall mean a person having a legal 
relationship specified in Subsection a. above; 
  c. the term local defense administrative organ shall mean 
the regional prefects of the Republic, the county and Budapest 
defense committees, local defense committees, and the mayors. 
  Authorizations 
  260. The Government is hereby authorized to 
promulgate a decree based on this Law regarding the following: 
  a. detailed rules related to the performance of national 
defense obligations, and to the entitlements of persons 
performing their national defense obligations, and their 
dependents; 
  b. rules pertaining to indemnification for performing the 
obligation of service and supply provision; 
  c. rules for the air raid warning system in case of an 
unexpected air attack; 
  d. the national defense administrative tasks of ministers; 
  e. the national defense tasks of organs subordinate to the 
central government, and of local government administrative 
organs participating in national defense; 
  f. rules providing operating conditions for the National 
Defense Council; 
  g. the order of, and rules for preparing draft decrees to 
be promulgated by the National Defense Council and the president 
of the Republic, pursuant to Paragraph 201.; 
  h. rules for funding and paying for the costs and 
expenditures specified in Paragraph 161.2. 
  Effective date 
  261.1. This Law shall take effect on 1 January 
1994. 
  261.2. Paragraph 56.2. of this law shall take 
effect simultaneously with the law governing the legal status of 
soldiers. 
  261.3. The following laws shall lose force on the 
effective date of this Law: 
  Law No. 1 of 1976 concerning national defense, as well as 
changes and supplements amending that law, including Law No. 26 
of 1988, Law No. 22 of 1989, Law No. 21 of 1990, and law No. 78 
of 1990; Paragraph 4. of Decree with the force of law No. 25 of 
1983 concerning the modernization of the organization of certain 
state organs; Paragraph 20.3. of Law No. 28 of 1989 concerning 
foreign travel and passports; Paragraph 18.7. of Law No. 42 of 
1989 amending certain laws in conjunction with amendments to the 
Constitution; Paragraph 43. of Law No. 20 of 1991 concerning 
functions and the jurisdiction of local governments and their 
organs, of regional prefects of the Republic, and of certain 
organs subordinate to the central government; Paragraph 42.1. of 
Law No 64 of 1992 concerning the registration of the personal 
data and addresses of citizens; Paragraph 103/A.3.13. of Law No. 
2 of 1975 concerning social security; and Paragraph 2.2 of Law 
No. 33 of 1989 concerning the operations and management of 
political parties. 
  261.4. The rules provided in Chapter IV shall be 
appropriate applied to soldiers of military age serving at the 
Border Guard. 
  261.5. Unless otherwise provided by this Law, the 
provisions of Decree with the force of law No. 10 of 1971 
concerning the service relationship of the professional members 
of armed forces and armed bodies shall be applied regarding the 
service relationship of the professional, reenlisted, and 
contractual personnel of the Honved Forces. 
  261.6. If so requested by a person entitled to 
receive indemnification, the provisions of Paragraph 172.6. 
shall also be applied to deaths and accidents that occurred 
while performing civilian service prior to the effective date of 
this Law. 
  261.7. Paragraph 31. of Decree with the force of 
law No. 5 of 1979 shall be amended by adding the following 
subsection d.: 
  (31. The records kept shall constitute official 
secrets; information from these records may be provided only to 
the following authorities:) 
  "d. data necessary to judge the merits of a petition, to 
the authority granting permit for the performance of unarmed 
military or civilian service." 
  262. The following provision shall replace 
Paragraphs 72.4.f. and 72.4.g. of Law No. 4 of 1957 concerning 
general rules of state administrative procedure, as amended by 
Paragraph 3. of Law No. 26 of 1991: 
  (72.4. A state administrative decision shall not be 
subject to judicial review) 
  "f. [if it requires] the appearance of a person of military 
age before a draft board, for medical examination, or for 
judging his request for an assignment to unarmed military 
service or civilian service, or for some other reason; 
  "g. [if it designates] employers for persons performing 
civilian service, calls for the commencement of civilian 
service, or retention in military service, or leaving a person 
in his civilian occupation during mobilization;" 
  263. The following provision shall replace the 
first and second sentences of Paragraph 45.2. of Law No. 90 of 
1991 concerning personal income taxes to be paid by private 
persons: 
  "45.2. Unless the amount paid is governed by Paragraphs 43. 
or 44., the payor shall deduct advance taxes from the amount 
paid. No advance taxes shall be deducted from tax exempt income 
(Paragraph 7.), and from income derived from the transfer of 
real property, movable assets, or the right to property 
(Paragraphs 22. through 25.)." 
  264. Paragraph 30.4. of Law No. 80 of 1993 
concerning higher education shall lose force. 
  In lieu of signatures: Arpad Goncz, president of 
the Republic; Gyorgy Szabad, president of the 
National Assembly. 
  Appendix to Law No. 110 of 1993 
  1. Persons performing armed military duty based on national 
defense obligations shall be sworn in. 
  The text of the oath shall be as follows: 
  ``I swear that I will faithfully serve the Hungarian 
Republic 
and that I will be a loyal soldier of the armed forces. I will 
courageously defend the interests of the Hungarian Republic and 
the rights and freedom of its citizens by observing laws, and by 
sacrificing my life if necessary.'' 
  2. Persons performing unarmed military duty based on 
national 
defense obligation shall make an affirmation: 
  The text of the affirmation shall be as follows: 
  "I hereby affirm that I will faithfully serve the Hungarian 
Republic by observing its laws, pursuant to requirements 
established for unarmed military service." 
  3. The professional, reenlisted (contractual) members of the 
armed forces shall take an oath. 
  The text of the oath shall be as follows: 
  ``I swear that I will be a faithful officer (ensign, 
noncommissioned officer) of the Hungarian Republic. 
  ``I will defend the independence of the Hungarian Republic 
and the rights of its citizens courageously by observing and 
making others observe the laws, with the force of the soldiers 
and weapons entrusted to me, and by sacrificing my life if 
necessary. 
  ``I will obey the commands of my superiors in the chain of 
command and provide leadership to my subordinates while 
respecting their rights with a sense of humanity and 
responsibility.'' 

